California, session 20252026, AB104.
do enact as follows: SECTION 1. Item 0540-103-0001 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025 is amended to read: 0540-103-0001—For local assistance, Secretary of the Natural Resources Agency ........................ 34,715,000 Schedule: (1) 0320-Administration of Natural Resources Agency ........................ 34,715,000 Provisions: 1. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $13,620,000 shall be available for Clear Lake Restoration. 2. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $5,400,000 shall be available to the Jewish Community Center of the East Bay for security and infrastructure. 3. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $5,000,000 shall be available for the Los Angeles Holocaust Memorial. 4. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $3,095,000 shall be available to the Child and Family Center for facility purchase, infrastructure improvements, vehicle purchases, and services. 5. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $2,500,000 shall be available to the City of San Diego for the Rancho Bernardo Community Park. 6. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $1,500,000 shall be available to the City of San Diego for vegetation management. 7. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $1,500,000 shall be available to the Escondido YMCA for infrastructure improvements and repairs. 8. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $1,100,000 shall be available to the City of Santa Clarita for oil well capping. 9. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $1,000,000 shall be available to the San Francisco Parks and Recreation Department for Portsmouth Square. SEC. 2. Item 0690-301-0001 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025 is amended to read: 0690-301-0001—For capital outlay, Office of Emergency Services ........................ 43,312,000 Schedule: (1) 0008390-Mather: Headquarters Checkpoint Security Enhancements ........................ 3,167,000 (a) Construction ........................ 3,167,000 (2) 0000121-Relocation of Red Mountain Communications Site, Del Norte County ........................ 40,145,000 (a) Construction ........................ 40,145,000 SEC. 3. Item 0977-401 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025 is amended to read: 0977-401—(a) The repayment period as described in subdivision (b) shall be extended for Palomar Health or any other nondesignated public hospitals participating in the Nondesignated Public Hospital Loan Program authorized under Provision (1) of Item 0977-101-0001 of the Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022) that had received a loan approval from, and entered into a loan and security agreement with, the California Health Facilities Financing Authority, and that the authority has determined were unable to repay their loan by the time required under the loan and security agreement. (b) Notwithstanding Provision (1)(e) of Item 0977-101-0001 of the Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022), Palomar Health or any other nondesignated public hospital participating in the loan program described in subdivision (a) that had received a loan approval from, and entered into a loan and security agreement with, the California Health Facilities Financing Authority shall be required to begin monthly repayments on the loan 36 months after the date of that loan, and shall discharge the loan within 24 months after beginning the monthly repayments. The monthly payments shall be amortized over the term of the loan at zero percent interest and there shall be no prepayment penalty. (c) Upon request by the California Health Facilities Financing Authority, Palomar Health or any other nondesignated public hospital that receives an extension of its repayment period pursuant to subdivision (a) shall provide any financial documentation or records deemed necessary to monitor compliance with the terms of such loan. SEC. 4. Item 1700-001-0001 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025 is amended to read: 1700-001-0001—For support of Civil Rights Department ........................ 64,469,000 Schedule: (1) 1490-Administration of Civil Rights Law ........................ 63,819,000 (2) 1495-Civil Rights Council ........................ 221,000 (3) 1500-Department of Justice Legal Services ........................ 429,000 Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding any other law, of the amount appropriated in Schedule (1) of this item, $2,383,000 allocated for the California vs. Hate Resource Line shall be exempt from the personal services contracting requirements of Article 4 (commencing with Section 19130) of Chapter 5 of Part 2 of Division 5 of Title 2 of the Government Code, from Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code, and the State Contracting Manual, and shall not be subject to the approval of the Department of General Services, including as specified in Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 14825) of Part 5.5 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. 2. Provision 1 is only applicable for fiscal year 2025–26. It is the intent of the Legislature that any extension of the California vs. Hate Resource Line beyond the 2025–26 fiscal year will not be exempted from these contracting requirements. 3. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (1) of this item, $883,000 shall be available to continue the work of the Community Reconciliation Unit through June 30, 2026, to respond to and help resolve discrimination-based community conflicts through customized conflict resolution, community engagement facilitation, mediation of community disputes, and civil rights-related conflict resolution education, consultation, and training. 4. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (1) of this item, $1,422,000 shall be available to extend the Investigation, Enforcement, and Conciliation Enhancement program through June 30, 2026, in order to further decrease the wait time between complaint intakes and investigative appointments, and to increase the number of complaints successfully conciliated and settled by investigators. SEC. 5. Item 3125-301-0140 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025 is amended to read: 3125-301-0140—For capital outlay, California Tahoe Conservancy, payable from the Environmental License Plate Fund ........................ 0 Schedule: (1) 0001388-Opportunity Acquisitions ........................ 4,300,000 (a) Acquisition ........................ 4,300,000 (2) Reimbursements to 0001388-Opportunity Acquisitions ........................ −4,300,000 (a) Acquisition ........................ −4,300,000 SEC. 6. Item 3125-301-0720 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025 is repealed. SEC. 7. Item 3125-301-6088 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025 is amended to read: 3125-301-6088—For capital outlay, California Tahoe Conservancy, payable from the California Drought, Water, Parks, Climate, Coastal Protection, and Outdoor Access For All Fund ........................ 2,870,000 Schedule: (1) 0001388-Opportunity Acquisitions ........................ 1,300,000 (a) Acquisition ........................ 1,300,000 (2) 0001390-Minor Capital Outlay ........................ 479,000 (a) Minor Projects ........................ 479,000 (3) 0013507-Lake Tahoe Blvd Demolition and Site Stabilization ........................ 591,000 (a) Construction ........................ 591,000 (4) 0015175-Upper Truckee Marsh South Project ........................ 500,000 (a) Study ........................ 500,000 SEC. 8. Item 3340-490 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025, to read: 3340-490—Reappropriation, California Conservation Corps. The balances of the appropriations provided in the following citations are reappropriated for the purposes provided for in those appropriations and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2026: 0001—General Fund (1) Item 3340-301-0001, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022) (1) 0003516 – Residential Center, Greenwood: New Residential Center (a) Construction SEC. 9. Item 3540-001-0001 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025 is amended to read: 3540-001-0001—For support of Department of Forestry and Fire Protection ........................ 1,396,397,000 Schedule: (1) 2461-Office of the State Fire Marshal ........................ 33,618,000 (2) 2465-Fire Protection ........................ 2,108,851,000 (3) 2470-Resource Management ........................ 21,268,000 (4) 2475-Board of Forestry and Fire Protection ........................ 370,000 (5) 2480-Department of Justice Legal Services ........................ 6,828,000 (6) 9900100-Administration ........................ 215,314,000 (7) 9900200-Administration—​Distributed ........................ −214,944,000 (8) Reimbursements to 2461-Office of the State Fire Marshal ........................ −25,567,000 (9) Reimbursements to 2465-Fire Protection ........................ −747,395,000 (10) Reimbursements to 2470-Resource Management ........................ −1,576,000 (11) Reimbursements to 9900100-Administration ........................ −370,000 Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding any other law, the Director of Finance may authorize the temporary or permanent redirection of funds from this item for purposes of emergency fire suppression and detection costs and related emergency revegetation costs. 2. Notwithstanding any other law, the Director of Finance may authorize a loan from the General Fund, in an amount not to exceed 45 percent of reimbursements appropriated in Schedule (9) of this item, to the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection, provided that: (a) The loan is to meet cash needs resulting from the delay in receipt of reimbursements for services provided. (b) The loan is for a short term and shall be repaid by November 15 of the fiscal year following that in which the loan was authorized. (c) Interest charges may be waived pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 16314 of the Government Code. (d) Within 10 days after approval, the Director of Finance shall notify the Joint Legislative Budget Committee of the loan approved pursuant to this provision. 3. The Director of Finance may adjust amounts in Schedule (2) to provide equivalent fire protection base funding changes to contract counties in accordance with Section 4130 of the Public Resources Code. 4. Notwithstanding any other law, the funds appropriated in this item for purposes of Division 10.5 (commencing with Section 12200) of the Public Resources Code shall be available for purposes of support or capital outlay. 5. Notwithstanding any other law, the Director of Finance may adjust this item for the direct and indirect cost reimbursements received pursuant to Sections 4142 and 4144 of the Public Resources Code. Any increase shall occur no sooner than 30 days after notification in writing of the necessity of the increase to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, or not sooner than whatever lesser time after notification the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, or the Chairperson’s designee, may in each instance determine. 6. Notwithstanding any other law, the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection may provide contractual services pursuant to Sections 4142 and 4144 of the Public Resources Code without an executed agreement from July to September of each fiscal year to better align contract start times with the budget process and to finalize staff benefit rates that are dependent upon actions by the Public Employees’ Retirement System and passage of the annual Budget Act. 7. Notwithstanding any other law or administrative procedure, the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection may amend its pilot and mechanic contract, along with its parts contract, for both scope changes and contracted amounts to address unanticipated workload resulting from higher than anticipated demand for these contracted services. The Department of Finance may augment this item and authorize expenditures in excess of the amounts appropriated in this item no sooner than 30 days after providing notification in writing of the necessity therefor to the Chairperson of the committee in each house of the Legislature that considers appropriations, the Chairpersons of the committees and the appropriate subcommittees in each house of the Legislature that consider the budget, and the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, or not sooner than whatever lesser time after that notification the Chairperson of the joint committee, or the Chairperson’s designee, may in each instance determine. 9. Notwithstanding Section 28.00 of this act, upon request of the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection, the Department of Finance may adjust Schedules (2) and (9) of this item to reflect increases in reimbursements from non-state entities providing assistance-by-hire emergency fire suppression services. The Director of Finance may authorize expenditures in excess of the amount appropriated in this item after the receipt of the request from the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection. Within 10 days of approval, the Department of Finance shall provide written notification of any such augmentation to the Chairpersons of the committees in each house of the Legislature that consider appropriations, the Chairpersons of the committees and the appropriate subcommittees of each house of the Legislature that consider the State Budget, and the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee. 11. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (2), $2,250,000 shall be available for deferred maintenance and special repair projects at existing Department of Forestry and Fire Protection facilities to accommodate additional hand crews. These funds shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2030. 12. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (2), $3,000,000 shall be available for a home hardening program, contingent upon passage of future legislation. 13. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (2), $1,804,000 shall be exempt from any applicable law requiring competitive bidding or the supervision or approval of another department or agency of state government for the procurement of or contracting with vendors for logistical support, including, but not limited to, feeding, lodging, training, and the purchase of personal protective equipment for additional fire suppression staff hired for the implementation of the 66-hour workweek. 14. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (2), $39,000,000 shall be used to begin transitioning a portion of Firefighter I positions assigned to hand crews within the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection to a permanent firefighter employment classification. It is the intent of the Legislature to appropriate $78,000,000 in 2026-27 and ongoing for this purpose. It is the intent of the Legislature to transition Firefighter I positions assigned to Engine Crews, Helitack, and Air Attack to a permanent firefighter employment classification, subject to enactment of future legislation and appropriation of necessary funding. SEC. 10. Item 3790-111-0577 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025 is amended to read: 3790-111-0577—For transfer by the Controller from the Abandoned Watercraft Abatement Fund to the Harbors and Watercraft Revolving Fund ........................ 3,000,000 SEC. 11. Item 3825-002-6088 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025 is amended to read: 3825-002-6088—For support of San Gabriel and Lower Los Angeles Rivers and Mountains Conservancy, payable from the California Drought, Water, Parks, Climate, Coastal Protection, and Outdoor Access for All Fund ........................ 400,000 Schedule: (1) 2990-San Gabriel and Lower Los Angeles Rivers and Mountains Conservancy ........................ 400,000 Provisions: 1. Funds appropriated in this item shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. SEC. 12. Item 3970-492 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025 is amended to read: 3970-492—Reappropriation, Department of Resources Recycling and Recovery. The amounts specified in the following citations are reappropriated for the purposes provided for in those appropriations and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure through June 30, 2026. 0100—California Used Oil Recycling Fund (1) Up to $16,000 of the amount appropriated in Item 3970-001-0100, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022). 0133—California Beverage Container Recycling Fund (1) Up to $20,000 of the amount appropriated in Item 3970-001-0133, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022). 0387—Integrated Waste Management Account, Integrated Waste Management Fund (1) Up to $20,000 of the amount appropriated in Item 3970-001-0387, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022). 3065—Electronic Waste Recycling and Recovery Account, Integrated Waste Management Fund (1) Up to $5,000 of the amount appropriated in Item 3970-001-3065, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022). SEC. 13. Item 5180-101-0890 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025 is amended to read: 5180-101-0890—For local assistance, State Department of Social Services, payable from the Federal Trust Fund ........................ 7,426,806,000 Schedule: (1) 4270010-CalWORKs ........................ 3,031,425,000 (2) 4270019-Other Assistance Payments ........................ 2,491,071,000 (3) 4270020-Child Care ........................ 1,904,310,000 Provisions: 1. Provisions 1, 4, 6, and 7 of Item 5180-101-0001 also apply to this item. 2. The Department of Finance may authorize the transfer of amounts from this item to Item 5180-001-0890 in order to fund the costs of the administrative hearing process associated with the CalWORKs program. 3. Upon request of the State Department of Social Services, the Department of Finance may increase or decrease the expenditure authority in this item to offset any increases or decreases in collections deposited in the Child Support Collections Recovery Fund and appropriated in Item 5180-101-8004. The Department of Finance shall provide notification of the adjustment to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee within 10 working days from the date of the department’s approval of the adjustment. 4. Upon request by the Department of Finance, the Controller shall transfer funds between this item and Item 5180-151-0890 as needed to reflect the estimated expenditure amounts for counties receiving funds provided by the federal Families First Transition Act. The Department of Finance shall report to the Legislature the amount to be transferred pursuant to this provision. The transfer shall be authorized at the time the report is made. 5. Notwithstanding any other law, upon approval of the Department of Finance, expenditure authority may be transferred between schedules within or between the following items for the State Department of Education and the State Department of Social Services: Items 6100-201-0890 and 5180-101-0890, and reimbursements. The aggregate amount of appropriation increases provided under this section during the fiscal year may not exceed the aggregate amount of appropriation decreases. This provision supports the continuity of care in the programs transitioned from the State Department of Education to the State Department of Social Services. 6. (a) Funds shall be allocated to meet federal requirements to improve the quality of childcare and shall be used in accordance with the approved California state plan for the federal Child Care and Development Fund that is developed pursuant to the requirements of Section 10211.5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. (b) Funds appropriated in this item shall not be expended to develop or support new information technology projects unless approved by the Department of Finance and not sooner than 30 days after notification to the chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee. 7. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (3), $21,767,000 shall be allocated for federal compliance items, including, but not limited to, implementation of a single rate structure informed by the alternative methodology. Prior to entering into any contracts for this purpose, the department shall provide a written notification to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee. This written notification shall include, at a minimum, an update regarding how the department proposes to structure childcare rates pursuant to the single rate structure in future years. The department shall include any updates on the use of these funds consistent with the reporting requirements in Section 10227.6 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. It is the intent of the Legislature that implementation of a single rate structure is consistent with Section 10227.6 of the Welfare and Institutions Code and subject to approval of the Legislature in a future budget act. (a) Notwithstanding any other law, contracts entered into or amended pursuant to this provision shall be exempt from the personal services contracting requirements of Article 4 (commencing with Section 19130) of Chapter 5 of Part 2 of Division 5 of Title 2 of the Government Code, from the Public Contract Code and the State Contracting Manual, and shall not be subject to the review and approval of the Department of General Services, including provisions pursuant to Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 14825) of Part 5.5 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code, and the State Administrative Manual. (b) Notwithstanding Section 11546 of the Government Code, contracts entered into or amended pursuant to this provision are exempt from review or approval of any division of the Department of Technology, upon approval from the Department of Finance. (c) Funds shall be available for encumbrance through September 30, 2027 and for liquidation through September 30, 2028 in alignment with the federal award. SEC. 14. Item 5180-151-0001 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025 is amended to read: 5180-151-0001—For local assistance, State Department of Social Services ........................ 841,759,000 Schedule: (1) 4275019-Children and Adult Services and Licensing ........................ 1,199,335,000 (2) 4275028-Special Programs ........................ 199,321,000 (3) Reimbursements to 4275019-Children and Adult Services and Licensing ........................ −534,397,000 (4) Reimbursements to 4275028-Special Programs ........................ −22,500,000 Provisions: 1. Provision 1 of Item 5180-101-0001 also applies to this item. 2. Notwithstanding Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 18000) of Part 6 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code and pursuant to Section 30029.8 of the Government Code, a loan not to exceed $50,000,000 shall be made available from the General Fund, from funds not otherwise appropriated, to cover the federal share or reimbursable share, or both, of costs of a program or programs when the federal funds or reimbursements have not been received by the state prior to the usual time for transmitting state payments for the federal or reimbursable share of costs. The loan from the General Fund shall be repaid when the federal or reimbursable share of costs for the program or programs becomes available. 3. The Department of Finance may authorize the establishment of positions and transfer of amounts from this item to Item 5180-001-0001, in order to allow the state to perform the facilities evaluation function of the Community Care Licensing Division in the event the counties fail to perform that function. 4. Nonfederal funds appropriated in this item that have been budgeted to meet the state’s Temporary Assistance for Needy Families maintenance-of-effort requirement established pursuant to the federal Personal Responsibility and Work Opportunity Reconciliation Act of 1996 (P.L. 104-193) shall not be expended in any way that would cause their disqualification as a federally allowable maintenance-of-effort expenditure. 5. The Department of Finance may authorize the establishment of positions and transfer of amounts from this item to Item 5180-001-0001 in order to allow the state to perform the adoptions function in the event that a county notifies the State Department of Social Services that it intends to cease performing that function. 6. Funds appropriated in this item for the Commercially Sexually Exploited Children Program required by Chapter 5.2 (commencing with Section 16524.6) of Part 4 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code shall be appropriately reduced by the Department of Finance to the extent any activities for which funding is included are also required by the federal Preventing Sex Trafficking and Strengthening Families Act (P.L. 113-183). 7. Of the total amount appropriated in this item, up to $4,000,000 shall be available for a county-optional block grant program, for allocation to local agencies to fund activities the Commission on State Mandates identified as reimbursable state mandates in the Interagency Child Abuse and Neglect Investigation Reports (CSM-00-TC-22) mandate. A local agency that receives funding according to this item shall not be eligible to submit claims to the Controller for reimbursement under Section 17560 of the Government Code for any costs related to the reimbursable state-mandated activities identified in CSM-00-TC-22 incurred in the same fiscal year during which the local agency received funding according to this item. The State Department of Social Services, in consultation with the California State Association of Counties, shall develop an allocation methodology for the purpose of distributing these funds to participating counties. Block grant funding apportioned according to this item is subject to annual financial and compliance audits. 8. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $7,000,000 shall be available for contracts under the authority of Chapter 5.6 (commencing with Section 13300) of Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code with organizations qualified pursuant to that chapter, to provide legal services to persons on California State University campuses. Use of these funds shall be reported in updates provided to the Legislature on the State Department of Social Services’ immigration programs. 9. (a) Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $87,000 shall be available to eligible federally recognized Indian tribes or tribal agencies to purchase Live Scan machines and receive ongoing reimbursements for fingerprinting costs, other maintenance and operation items, or related activities necessary to enable the tribes or tribal agencies to complete background checks for the purpose of approving tribally approved homes for the placement of Indian children into foster or adoptive care pursuant to Section 10553.12 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. (b) The funding in subdivision (a) shall be available to the tribes or tribal agencies currently approved by the Department of Justice to receive state and federal level summary criminal history information pursuant to Section 11105.08 of the Penal Code. (c) Of the funding in subdivision (a), the amount that each tribe or tribal agency can utilize for the purposes specified in subdivision (a) will be determined in consultation with, and subject to review and approval by, the State Department of Social Services. 10. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $18,146,000 shall be available to support enhanced care planning and assessment services, exceptional care and supervision needs for a child in a licensed setting, or other exceptional community, educational, or family supports that have been identified by a qualified individual or a child and family team, as necessary to meet the needs of a child in the least restrictive setting. The State Department of Social Services shall allocate funds through contracts with community-based providers or entities or through local assistance allocations to counties that support new or expanded programs, services, and practices that ensure the provision of the high-quality continuum of care that is designed to support foster children in the least restrictive setting, consistent with a child’s permanency plan. 11. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $4,145,000 shall be available for the State Department of Social Services to provide funding to support legal counsel to represent an Indian tribe in California juvenile court proceedings contingent upon the enactment of statutory changes detailing objectives, implementation design and timelines, data collection, and outcome measurements for these activities. 12. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $4,777,000 shall be available for the State Department of Social Services to provide financial assistance with recruiting and approving homes for the purpose of foster or adoptive placement of an Indian child contingent upon the enactment of statutory changes detailing objectives, implementation design and timelines, data collection, and outcome measurements for these activities. The department shall seek federal approvals or waivers necessary to claim federal reimbursement under Title IV-E of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 670 et seq.) in order to maximize funding for the purpose described in this section. 13. Of the amount appropriated in this item, $10,000,000 shall be available for legal services pursuant to Chapter 5.6 (commencing with Section 13300) of Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, for, but not limited to, unaccompanied undocumented minors and other minors in removal proceedings, and current or past beneficiaries of federal temporary protected status, to be allocated at the discretion of the State Department of Social Services. These funds shall be available for encumbrance until June 30, 2028, and expenditure until June 30, 2030. Use of these funds shall be reported in updates provided to the Legislature on the department’s immigration programs. 14. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $83,800,000 shall be allocated on a one-time basis for the Home Safe Program and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. Upon order of the Department of Finance, up to five percent of the amount appropriated for the Home Safe Program may be transferred to Item 5180-001-0001 for administrative costs for the program, including, but not limited to, the technical assistance and outcomes tracking referenced in Section 10618.8 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. Funds transferred to Item 5180-001-0001 shall also be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. All funds expended towards the purposes described in Section 10618.8 of the Welfare and Institutions Code shall be subject to subdivision (f) of that section. 15. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $81,000,000 shall be allocated on a one-time basis for the Bringing Families Home Program and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. Upon order of the Department of Finance, up to five percent of the amount appropriated for the Bringing Families Home Program may be transferred to Item 5180-001-0001 for administrative costs for the program, including, but not limited to, the technical assistance and outcomes tracking referenced in Section 10618.8 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. Funds transferred to Item 5180-001-0001 shall also be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. All funds expended towards the purposes described in Section 10618.8 of the Welfare and Institutions Code shall be subject to subdivision (f) of that section. 16. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $44,600,000 shall be allocated on a one-time basis for the Housing and Disability Advocacy Program and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. Upon order of the Department of Finance, up to five percent of the amount appropriated for the Housing and Disability Advocacy Program may be transferred to Item 5180-001-0001 for administrative costs for the program, including, but not limited to, the technical assistance and outcomes tracking referenced in Section 10618.8 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. Funds transferred to Item 5180-001-0001 shall also be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. All funds expended towards the purposes described in Section 10618.8 of the Welfare and Institutions Code shall be subject to subdivision (f) of that section. 17. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $10,000,000 shall be allocated on a one-time basis for the Children’s Holistic Immigration Representation Project and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2027. 18. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $14,500,000 shall be allocated on a one-time basis for the Holocaust Survivors Assistance Program to continue to provide services through the 2025–26 fiscal year and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2027. 19. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $600,000 shall be allocated for the first year of a multi-year effort to develop, no later than July 1, 2027, a standardized curriculum for mandated reporters, consistent with statutory changes made to Chapter 11 (commencing with Section 18950) of Part 6 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code accompanying this act. 20. (a) Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (1), $23,000,000 shall be provided to the State Department of Social Services to distribute to eligible licensed foster family agencies that experienced a documented increase in the costs of liability insurance. This funding shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2027. (b) The State Department of Social Services shall administer the funding described in subprovision (a) to eligible licensed foster family agencies using criteria and a methodology determined by the department in written directives, developed in consultation with the California Alliance of Child and Family Services and the County Welfare Directors Association of California. (c) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the State Department of Social Services may implement, interpret, or make specific this provision, in whole or in part, by means of all-county letters, information notices, or other similar instructions, without taking any further regulatory action. 21. (a) Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (2), $10,000,000 shall be available for grants or contracts, and state operations, under the authority of Chapter 5.6 (commencing with Section 13300) of Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code with organizations qualified pursuant to that chapter, to provide immigration-related services, including removal defense. (b) Upon approval of the Department of Finance, funds made available pursuant to subprovision (a) may be transferred to Item 5180-001-0001 to implement and administer immigration-related services. (c) Following the award of funding made available pursuant to subprovision (a), the State Department of Social Services shall provide written notification to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee on the distribution of funds made available pursuant to subprovision (a). The notification shall include, at a minimum, the grant awardees, grant amounts, and grant period, and the amount and intended purpose of any funds transferred pursuant to subprovision (b). SEC. 15. Item 5180-151-0890 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025 is amended to read: 5180-151-0890—For local assistance, State Department of Social Services, payable from the Federal Trust Fund ........................ 1,722,051,000 Schedule: (1) 4275019-Children and Adult Services and Licensing ........................ 1,719,801,000 (2) 4275028-Special Programs ........................ 2,250,000 Provisions: 1. Provisions 1, 3, and 5 of Item 5180-151-0001 also apply to this item. 2. Upon request by the Department of Finance, the Controller shall transfer funds between this item and Item 5180-101-0890 as needed to reflect the estimated expenditure amounts for counties receiving funds provided by the federal Family First Transition Act (Sec. 602, P.L. 116-94). The Department of Finance shall report to the Legislature the amount to be transferred pursuant to this provision. The transfer shall be authorized at the time the report is made. 3. (a) Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (1), $8,500,000 shall be provided to the State Department of Social Services to distribute to eligible licensed foster family agencies that experienced a documented increase in the costs of liability insurance. This funding shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2027. (b) The State Department of Social Services shall administer the funding described in subprovision (a) to eligible licensed foster family agencies using criteria and a methodology determined by the department in written directives, developed in consultation with the California Alliance of Child and Family Services and the County Welfare Directors Association of California. (c) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the State Department of Social Services may implement, interpret, or make specific this provision, in whole or in part, by means of all-county letters, information notices, or other similar instructions, without taking any further regulatory action. SEC. 16. Item 5225-493 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025, to read: 5225-493—Reappropriation, Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation. The amounts specified in the following citations are reappropriated for the purposes provided for in those appropriations and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2026: 0001—General Fund (1) Up to $5,000,000 in Item 5225-008-0001, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024). SEC. 17. Item 5225-494 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025, to read: 5225-494—Reappropriation, Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation. The amounts specified in the following citations are reappropriated for the purposes provided for in those appropriations and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2026: 0917—Inmate Welfare Fund (1) Up to $5,000,000 in Item 5225-001-0917, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024). SEC. 18. Item 6100-107-0001 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025 is amended to read: 6100-107-0001—For local assistance, State Department of Education (Proposition 98), County Offices of Education Fiscal Oversight ........................ 8,221,000 Schedule: (1) 5200028-School Apportionment—​County Office of Education ........................ 5,731,000 (2) 5200050-School Apportionment—​County Office of Education Fiscal Oversight: Education Audit Appeal Panel ........................ 42,000 (3) 5200054-School Apportionment—​County Office of Education Oversight: Interim Reporting ........................ 986,000 (4) 5200058-School Apportionment—​County Office of Education Oversight: Staff Development ........................ 1,462,000 Provisions: 1. Funds appropriated in this item shall be considered offsetting revenues within the meaning of subdivision (e) of Section 17556 of the Government Code for any reimbursable mandated cost claim for school district and county office of education fiscal accountability reporting. Local educational agencies accepting funding from this item shall reduce their estimated and actual mandate reimbursement claims by the amount of funding provided to them from this item. 2. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1): (a) $4,857,000 shall be allocated by the Controller directly to a county office of education selected pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 42127.8 of the Education Code to oversee Fiscal Crisis and Management Assistance Team (FCMAT) responsibilities with respect to these funds and to meet the costs of participation under Section 42127.8 of the Education Code. (b) $500,000 shall be allocated to FCMAT to supplement the funds provided in subdivision (a) of this provision to support the performance of any responsibilities under Section 42127.8 of the Education Code. These funds shall only be made available for expenditure upon request of the Chief Financial Officer of FCMAT, subject to the approval of the Director of Finance. (c) $374,000 shall be allocated to FCMAT for the purpose of providing, through computer technology, financial and demographic information that is interactive and immediately accessible to all local educational agencies to assist them in their decisionmaking process. To ensure a completely integrated system, this computer information should be developed in collaboration with the State Department of Education, and should be compatible with the hardware and software of the Department, so that this information may also assist state-level policymakers in making comparable standardized financial information available to the local educational agencies and the public. 3. Funds appropriated in Schedule (2) are for the additional staff and resources needed for the Fiscal Crisis and Management Assistance Team to ensure that timely resolution of audit findings is achieved pursuant to the directives of Section 41344 of the Education Code. 4. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (3): (a) $115,000 shall be available for no more than a 25-percent state reimbursement to county offices of education for fiscal oversight of school districts with audit exceptions, districts with qualified or negative interim reports, districts that may be unable to meet financial obligations for the current or subsequent fiscal years, or districts with disapproved budgets. (b) Up to $871,000 of the funds may be used to fully reimburse county offices of education activities for extraordinary costs of audits, examinations, or reviews of any school district or charter school in cases in which fraud, misappropriation of funds, or other illegal fiscal practices require review by the county offices of education, pursuant to Section 1241.5 of the Education Code. The State Board of Education may request any county superintendent of schools to initiate such an audit, examination, or review for any charter school or all-charter district for which the board has oversight responsibility. Allocation of the funds shall be administered by the Fiscal Crisis and Management Assistance Team on a reimbursement basis. All reimbursements shall be subject to the approval of both the Department of Finance and the State Department of Education. 5. The amount appropriated in Schedule (3) shall be available until July 30, 2026, for the following, in order of descending priority: (a) Any review or audit jointly requested by the State Department of Education and the Department of Finance, to be conducted by a county superintendent of schools in cases in which fraud, misappropriation of funds, or other illegal fiscal practices are suspected. (b) Staff development pursuant to Provision 7. (c) Regional assistance teams developed pursuant to subdivision (b) of Provision 2. 6. Notwithstanding Section 26.00, the funds appropriated in this item shall be allocated in accordance with the above schedule unless a revision to the allocations contained herein has been approved by the Department of Finance. The Department of Finance may not authorize any such revision sooner than 30 days after notification in writing of the necessity to the chairpersons of the committees in each house of the Legislature that consider appropriations and the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, or not sooner than whatever lesser time the chairperson of the joint committee, or the chairperson’s designee, may in each instance determine. 7. (a) The funds appropriated in Schedule (4) are for the purpose of providing staff development to local educational agency school finance and business personnel, as provided in Section 42127.8 of the Education Code. Funds appropriated in Schedule (4) shall be allocated by the Controller directly to a county office of education selected pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 42127.8 of the Education Code to oversee the Fiscal Crisis and Management Assistance Team’s responsibilities with respect to these funds. (b) Of the funds in Schedule (4), $150,000 of the funds shall be used to support professional learning opportunities offered to local educational agencies by the Fiscal Crisis and Management Assistance Team. 8. Notwithstanding any other law, funds appropriated in Schedules (1), (2), (3), and (4), to a county office of education selected pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 42127.8 of the Education Code to oversee the Fiscal Crisis and Management Assistance Team responsibilities shall be allocated by the Controller directly to that county office of education as soon as possible, but no later than 60 days after the enactment of this act. Funds appropriated in this item shall not be subject to grant allocation or review processes by the State Department of Education or the Superintendent of Public Instruction. The county office of education that receives these funds shall annually provide a report detailing past year expenditures, identifying the local educational agencies (LEAs) assisted with these funds, and a summary of progress for each. Additionally, the report shall identify a plan for the proposed uses of the allocations in this item, identifying estimated expenditures for each LEA anticipated to be served. This report shall be submitted to the State Department of Education and to the Department of Finance by October 1 of each year. SEC. 19. Item 6100-492 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025, to read: 6100-492—Reappropriation, State Department of Education. The amounts specified in the following citations are reappropriated for the purposes provided for in those appropriations and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2026: 0660—Public Buildings Construction Fund (1) Item 6100-301-0660, Budget Act of 2024 (Chs. 22, 35, and 994, Stats. 2024) (1) 0010469-California School for the Deaf-Riverside: Athletic Complex Replacement and Expansion (a) Working drawings SEC. 20. Item 6440-001-0001 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025 is amended to read: 6440-001-0001—For support of University of California ........................ 4,778,741,000 Schedule: (1) 5440-Support ........................ 4,778,741,000 Provisions: 1. This appropriation is exempt from Sections 6.00 and 31.00. 2. (a) The Regents of the University of California shall implement measures to reduce the university’s cost structure. (b) The Legislature finds and declares that many state employees hold positions with comparable scope of responsibilities, complexity, breadth of job functions, experience requirements, and other relevant factors to those employees designated to be in the Senior Management Group pursuant to existing Regents Policy. (c) (1) Therefore, at a minimum, the Regents shall, when considering compensation for any employee designated to be in the Senior Management Group, use a market reference zone that includes state employees. (2) At a minimum, the Regents shall include in a market reference zone all comparable positions from the lists included in subdivision (l) of Section 8 of Article III of the California Constitution and Article 1 (commencing with Section 11550) of Chapter 6 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. 2.1. Notwithstanding any other law, the Director of Finance may reduce funds appropriated in this item by an amount equal to the estimated Cal Grant and Middle Class Scholarship Program cost increases caused by a 2025–26 academic year increase in systemwide tuition. No reduction may be authorized pursuant to this provision sooner than 30 days after the Director of Finance provides notice of the intended reduction to the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee. 3. (a) The Controller shall transfer funds from this appropriation upon receipt of a report from the Department of Finance indicating the amount of debt service anticipated to become due and payable in the fiscal year associated with state general obligation bonds issued for university projects. (b) The Controller shall return funds to this appropriation upon receipt of a report from the Department of Finance. 4. Payments made by the state to the University of California for each month from July through April shall not exceed one-twelfth of the amount appropriated in this item, less the amount that is expected to be transferred pursuant to Provision 3. Transfers of funds pursuant to Provision 3 shall not be considered payments made by the state to the university. 5. (a) Of the funds appropriated in this item, $15,800,000 shall be available to support meal donation programs, food pantries serving students, CalFresh enrollment, and other means of directly providing nutrition assistance to students. All monetary assistance provided to students pursuant to this subprovision shall be distributed to the student by the campus financial aid office. The funds described in this subprovision may also be used for any of the following: (1) To assist homeless and housing-insecure students in securing stable housing. (2) To supply students with personal hygiene products. (3) To establish basic-needs centers as a centralized location on campus where students experiencing basic-needs insecurity can be identified, supported, and linked to on- and off-campus resources to support timely program completion. Campus basic-needs centers may use funds for operations of the center. (4) To designate or hire dedicated basic-needs coordinators for the basic-needs centers who will serve as a single point of contact for students. (b) The University of California shall report to the Department of Finance and relevant policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature by February 1 of each year regarding the use of funds specified in subdivision (a) and Provision 7. The report shall include, but not necessarily be limited to, all of the following information for the preceding fiscal year and estimates of all of the following for the current fiscal year: (1) The amount of funds distributed to campuses, and identification of which campuses received funds. (2) For each campus, a programmatic budget summarizing how the funds were spent. The budget shall include any other funding used to supplement the General Fund. (3) A description of the types of programs in which each campus invested. (4) A list of campuses that accept or plan to accept electronic benefits transfer. (5) A list of campuses that participate or plan to participate in the CalFresh Restaurant Meals Program. (5.5) The number of students who first started receiving CalFresh benefits in the preceding year as well as the total number of students in the preceding year receiving CalFresh. (5.8) The number of campuses that have a data-sharing agreement with the relevant county operating the CalFresh program with the purpose of identifying new, continuing, and returning students who are potentially eligible for CalFresh benefits, or efforts underway to enact such an agreement. (6) A list of campuses that offer or plan to offer emergency housing or assistance with long-term housing arrangements. (7) A description of how campuses leveraged or coordinated with other state or local resources to address housing and food insecurity, and student mental health. (7.1) The number of students receiving mental health services on campus, disaggregated by race, ethnicity, gender, age group, and type of service received. (7.2) The average wait time for initial routine mental health counseling appointments. (7.3) The average number of campus mental health counseling appointments per student. (7.4) The number of students referred to off-campus providers for mental health services. (7.5) The number of student mental health staff by provider type and the counselor-to-student ratio. (7.6) Total spending on student mental health services, by fund source, including spending covered by insurance providers. (8) An analysis describing how funds reduced food insecurity and homelessness among students, increased student mental health, and, if feasible, how funds impacted student outcomes such as persistence or completion. (9) Other findings and best practices implemented by campuses. 6. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $21,300,000 shall be available to increase student mental health resources. 7. (a) Of the funds appropriated in this item, $3,700,000 shall be available to support rapid rehousing efforts assisting homeless and housing-insecure students. All monetary assistance to students shall be distributed to the student by the campus financial aid office. (b) Campuses shall establish ongoing partnerships with community organizations that have a tradition of helping populations experiencing homelessness to provide wraparound services and rental subsidies for students. Funds appropriated in this item may be used for, but authorized uses are not limited to, the following activities: (1) Connecting students with community case managers who have knowledge and expertise in accessing safety net resources. (2) Establishing ongoing emergency housing procedures, including on-campus and off-campus resources. (3) Providing emergency grants that are necessary to secure housing or to prevent the imminent loss of housing. (c) Funding shall be allocated to campuses based on demonstrated need. (d) The terms “homeless” and “housing insecure” shall be defined as students who lack a fixed, regular, and adequate nighttime residence. This includes students who are: (1) Sharing the housing of other persons due to loss of housing, economic hardship, or a similar reason. (2) Living in motels, hotels, trailer parks, or camping grounds due to the lack of alternative adequate accommodations. (3) Living in emergency or transitional shelters. (4) Abandoned in hospitals. (5) Living in a primary nighttime residence that is a public or private place not designed for or ordinarily used as a regular sleeping accommodation for human beings. (6) Living in cars, parks, public spaces, abandoned buildings, substandard housing, bus or train stations, or similar settings. (e) The University of California shall submit a report to the Director of Finance and, in conformity with Section 9795 of the Government Code, to the Legislature by February 1 of each year regarding the use of these funds, for the preceding fiscal year and estimates for the current fiscal year, for information including the number of coordinators hired, number of students served by campus, distribution of funds by campus, a description of the types of programs funded, and other relevant outcomes, such as the number of students that were able to secure permanent housing, and whether students receiving support remained enrolled at the institution or graduated. This report may be submitted jointly with other basics needs reporting due to the Legislature. 8. (a) Of the funds appropriated in this item, $12,900,000 shall be available to support and expand existing UC Programs in Medical Education and to establish a new UC Program in Medical Education focused on Native American communities. These funds may also be available to establish additional UC Programs in Medical Education that are state priorities. The University of California is encouraged to use these funds to support UC Programs in Medical Education that would serve underrepresented areas of the state. (b) One-third of the funds appropriated in this provision shall be used to augment need-based financial aid for UC Programs in Medical Education students. (c) The University of California shall report the following information about UC Programs in Medical Education program outcomes to the Department of Finance and the Legislature annually by March 1, until March 1, 2027: (1) Enrollment numbers and student demographics in each program. (2) A summary of each program’s current curriculum. (3) Graduation and residency placement rates for each program. (4) To the extent feasible, postgraduate data on where each program’s graduates currently practice and the extent to which they serve the populations and communities targeted by the program in which they participated. 9. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $1,823,000 shall be used for legal services for undocumented and immigrant students, faculty, and staff. 10. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $4,000,000, of which $1,000,000 is available on a one-time basis for the 2025–26 fiscal year, shall be used for the University of California Firearm Violence Research Center. It is the intent of the Legislature that these funds be directly allocated by the University of California to the University of California Firearm Violence Research Center, and that the University of California and the University of California, Davis, campus shall not assess administrative costs or charges against these funds. 11. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $1,000,000 shall be used for the Institute on Global Conflict and Cooperation. 12. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $4,000,000 shall be used by the University of California to provide summer-term financial aid to any student who is eligible for state financial aid and is a California resident, including students receiving an exemption for nonresident tuition pursuant to Section 68130.5 of the Education Code. These funds shall be used to supplement and not supplant existing funds provided by the University of California for summer-term financial aid. The Legislature finds and declares that this provision is a state law within the meaning of subsection (d) of Section 1621 of Title 8 of the United States Code. 13. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $6,000,000 shall be available on an ongoing basis to support foster youth programs pursuant to Section 92663 of the Education Code. 14. By November 1 each year, the University of California shall report key information regarding UCPath to the Department of Finance and the Joint Legislative Budget Committee. At a minimum, the report shall include UCPath’s staffing levels, funding by source, and spending by function. The funding source data shall summarize fund sources used by campuses to cover any campus assessment. The report shall include actual data for the prior fiscal year, budgeted data for the current fiscal year, and projected data for the coming fiscal year. The report shall include any cost savings resulting from the UCPath project at the campus level. 15. To provide for legislative oversight, the Office of the President of the University of California shall report to the Legislature and the Department of Finance, by September 30 each year, all of the following information for the preceding fiscal year and estimates of all of the following for the current fiscal year: (a) The amount of any campus assessments charged to support the Office of the President of the University of California, reflecting amounts contributed by each campus and the fund source or sources from which those amounts were paid. (b) The total budget of the Office of the President of the University of California. (c) A categorized list of actual and planned budgetary expenditures for the Office of the President of the University of California. (d) Factors contributing to any year-over-year change in the budget of the Office of the President of the University of California. (e) The amount of the budget of the Office of the President of the University of California that either passes through to recipients across the state or supports fee-for-service activities aligned with the university’s mission. (f) Information on reserves and fund balances held by the Office of the President of the University of California. 16. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $650,000 shall be available to support the integration of Association of Independent California Colleges and Universities members onto the ASSIST platform. 17. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $1,000,000 shall be available on an ongoing basis to support the California Vectorborne Disease Surveillance Gateway. 18. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $4,000,000 shall be available to the University of California on an ongoing basis for disbursement to all undergraduate-serving University of California campuses, after consultation with Underground Scholars directors and coordinators, to establish and sustain Underground Scholars programs as a centralized location on campus where incarcerated, formerly incarcerated, and system-impacted students can be provided with recruitment programs, retention services, advocacy, and wellness programs to support admission to the University of California system and timely program completion. Campuses shall share best practices for program operations annually with other University of California campuses for purposes of developing spending plans to serve incarcerated, formerly incarcerated, and system-impacted students. Each undergraduate-serving University of California campus shall have one or more dedicated Underground Scholars directors and coordinators who will serve as a point of contact for students. 19. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $5,000,000 shall be available on an ongoing basis for the University of California to establish and operate student services programs on each campus to serve undocumented students. 20. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $22,500,000 shall be available on an ongoing basis to support Student Academic Preparation and Educational Partnerships programs. 21. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $75,000 shall be available on an ongoing basis to support the University of California, Los Angeles Anderson School of Management to include climate change economic impacts by California region in the UCLA Anderson Forecast economic forecasting model for California. 22. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $21,000,000 shall be available to the University of California to support UC Medical School Projects at UC Merced and UC Riverside. 23. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $13,000,000 shall be available on an ongoing basis to support research, education, and public engagement on labor issues in California. The funds shall be allocated as follows: (a) $3,000,000 to the University of California, Berkeley Labor Center. (b) $3,000,000 to the University of California, Los Angeles Labor Center. (c) $3,000,000 to the University of California, Merced Community and Labor Center. (d) $500,000 to the University of California, Berkeley Labor Occupational Health Program. (e) $500,000 to the University of California, Los Angeles Labor Occupational Safety and Health Program. (f) $3,000,000 to be allocated to support a multicampus initiative as determined by a five-member committee comprising the directors of the centers specified in subprovisions (a), (b), and (c), or their designees, as well as two members appointed by the California Federation of Labor. The committee shall allocate these funds based on proposals submitted by the University of California’s Davis, Irvine, Riverside, San Diego, Santa Barbara, and Santa Cruz campuses. The committee shall determine the criteria and timeline to submit proposals, as well as how to allocate funds among eligible proposals. 24. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $49,701,000 ongoing General Fund moneys shall be allocated to support approved UC Higher Education Student Housing Grant Program projects. 25. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $33,300,000 ongoing General Fund moneys shall be allocated to support UC Merced and UC Riverside Campus Expansion Project and the UC Berkeley Clean Energy Campus Project. 26. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $2,000,000 ongoing General Fund moneys shall be allocated to support the UC Riverside School of Medicine. 27. It is the intent of the Legislature to defer an ongoing base increase of $240,773,000 from 2025–26, as follows: (a) In 2026–27, $96,309,000 of the 2025–26 compact payment will be provided on an ongoing basis. In 2027–28, a one-time back payment of $240,773,000 will be made for the deferral made in 2025–26. In 2028–29, the remaining $144,464,000 of the compact payment originally scheduled for 2026–27 will be provided on an ongoing basis. 28. It is the intent of the Legislature to defer $129,692,000 one-time from the General Fund from 2025–26 until 2026–27. 29. For 2025–26, the Director of Finance may authorize a no-interest, short-term loan from General Fund resources, upon the request of the University of California, to assist cash flow resources for purposes of remediating state payment deferrals. (a) A loan may be authorized pursuant to this section no sooner than 30 days after notification in writing of the necessity therefor is provided to the chairpersons of the committees in each house of the Legislature that consider appropriations and the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, or not sooner than whatever lesser time that notification the chairperson of that joint committee, or the chairperson’s designee, may in each instance determine. 30. (a) As specified in Section 93000 of the Education Code, it is the intent of the Legislature that the University of California replace an additional 902 nonresident undergraduate full-time equivalent students annually from 2022‒23 through 2026‒27 with an equal number of resident undergraduate full-time equivalent students combined at the Berkeley, Los Angeles, and San Diego campuses. The total combined annual replacement of nonresident students should be 902 full-time equivalent students, with Berkeley, Los Angeles, and San Diego each contributing towards the 902 full-time equivalent student replacement total annually. If the University of California replaces more than 902 nonresident undergraduate full-time students in the 2025‒26 enrollment target, those additional students can be counted towards the 2026‒27 target. Nonresident undergraduate full-time equivalent student replacement above that annual 902 target from 2022–23, 2023–24, and 2024–25 can be counted towards the replacement of 902 nonresident undergraduate full-time equivalent students in 2025–26. (b) If the actual reduction in nonresident undergraduate enrollment in 2025‒26 at these campuses is fewer than 902 full-time equivalent students, the Director of Finance shall reduce funding for the University of California by the portion of the appropriation in the deferred allocation that is attributable to each student under the target reduction level, as specified in Section 93000 of the Education Code. (c) It is the intent of the Legislature to defer ongoing nonresident replacement funding of $31,000,000 from 2025–26 to 2026–27. In 2027–28, it is the intent of the Legislature to provide a one-time back payment of $31,000,000. 31. (a) It is the intent of the Legislature that the University of California shall increase resident undergraduate enrollment by 2,947 full-time equivalent students (FTES) in 2025–26 over the estimated 2024–25 baseline level of 206,588 FTES to a total enrollment of 209,535. (b) If the University of California enrolls fewer resident undergraduate FTES than specified in subdivision (a), the Director of Finance may reduce funding proportional to each student under the specified level. Funding shall be reduced at the 2025–26 state marginal cost rate of $11,640 per FTES. If the University of California enrolls more resident undergraduate FTES than specified in subdivision (a), those additional students will be counted towards the 2026–27 target. (c) It is the intent of the Legislature that the University of California also increase resident undergraduate enrollment by 2,968 FTES in 2026–27, for a total level of 212,503 resident undergraduate FTES in 2026–27. (d) The systemwide growth identified in this provision is inclusive of the additional 902 resident undergraduate FTES resulting from the replacement of nonresident undergraduate FTES identified in Provision 30 of this item. 32. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $1,500,000 shall be available on an ongoing basis to support students with disabilities. This funding shall supplement, not supplant, core funds the University of California spends to support these students. The University of California shall allocate these funds to campuses based upon their number of students with disabilities. Campuses shall use these funds to improve services for these students, with a focus on increasing the number of professional staff serving them, thereby reducing their associated caseload. 33. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $3,000,000 ongoing General Fund shall be available to support the University of California, Los Angeles Ralph J. Bunche Center for African American Studies. 34. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $430,000 ongoing General Fund shall be available to support the California Newspaper Projects at the University of California, Riverside. 35. (a) Of the funds appropriated in this item, $15,000,000 shall be provided on a one-time basis to the Journalism Fellowship Program at the University of California, Berkeley. (b) The University of California, Berkeley, may use up to 5 percent of this allocation to administer the program. 36. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $5,000,000 one-time General Fund shall be available on a one-time basis to support the Cal-Bridge Initiative. These funds can be used to support fellowships, undergraduate research, salaries and benefits for post doctoral students, scholarships for students prior to their first Ph.D. year, faculty professional development, and administration of the program. 37. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $1,800,000, one-time General Fund, shall be available to expand the University of California, Los Angeles First Star Foster Youth Program and to establish at least one additional First Star Foster Youth Cohort at University of California campuses to be selected through a competitive grant process by the Office of the President of the University of California. When selecting the participating campuses, the Office of the President shall consider, at least, the following factors: the foster youth population density around each proposed campus location, possible partnerships with other organizations assisting the foster youth population, public transportation accessibility, and ability to leverage other funding sources or in-kind resources to support program implementation. 38. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $5,000,000 one-time General Fund shall be available for the University of California, San Diego, to develop a bachelor's degree program in public health in South San Diego. 39. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $750,000 one-time General Fund shall be available for the University of California, Los Angeles, to research social media. 40. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $1,800,000 one-time General Fund shall be available for the University of California, San Francisco, to establish a dentistry pilot program. 41. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $3,000,000 one-time General Fund shall be available for the University of California Menopause Center. 42. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $2,500,000 one-time General Fund shall be available for the University of California, San Diego, for the ALERTCalifornia program. 43. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $3,600,000 one-time General Fund shall be available for the University of California, Office of the President, for campus climate and antidiscrimination efforts. 44. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $1,500,000 shall be made available to support the PRIME Central Coast program at the University of California, Davis School of Medicine, in collaboration with the University of California, Santa Cruz. These funds shall be available for encumbrance and expenditure through July 1, 2030. 45. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $4,500,000 one-time General Fund shall be available for the University of California Institute for Transportation Studies. SEC. 21. Item 6610-001-0001 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025 is amended to read: 6610-001-0001—For support of California State University ........................ 4,950,068,000 Schedule: (1) 5560-Support ........................ 4,950,068,000 Provisions: 1. This appropriation is exempt from Sections 6.00 and 31.00. 2. (e) Of the funds appropriated in this item, $5,500,000 shall be available on an ongoing basis to support the estimated costs of an expanded fee waiver for Medal of Honor recipients, children of Medal of Honor recipients, and dependents of service-injured veterans attending the California State University. (f) Of the funds appropriated in this item, $12,000,000 shall be available to support foster youth programs pursuant to Section 89348 of the Education Code. 2.1. (a) Of the funds appropriated in this item, $15,800,000 shall be available to increase student mental health resources. (b) Of the funds appropriated in this item, $26,300,000 is available for the Graduation Initiative to sustain and expand the California State University Basic Needs Initiative. (c) The California State University shall report to the Department of Finance and relevant policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature by March 1, 2026, and annually thereafter, regarding the use of funds specified in subdivisions (a) and (b). The report shall include, but not necessarily be limited to, all of the following information: (1) The amount of funds distributed to campuses, and identification of which campuses received funds. (2) For each campus, a programmatic budget summarizing how the funds were spent. The budget shall include any other funding used to supplement the General Fund. (3) A description of the types of programs in which each campus invested. (4) A list of campuses that accept or plan to accept electronic benefits transfer. (5) A list of campuses that participate or plan to participate in the CalFresh Restaurant Meals Program. (5.5) The number of students who first started receiving CalFresh benefits in the preceding year as well as the total number of students in the preceding year receiving CalFresh. (5.8) The number of campuses that have a data-sharing agreement with the relevant county operating the CalFresh program with the purpose of identifying new, continuing, and returning students who are potentially eligible for CalFresh benefits, or efforts underway to enact such an agreement. (6) A list of campuses that offer or plan to offer emergency housing or assistance with long-term housing. (6.1) The number of students receiving mental health services on campus, disaggregated by race and ethnicity, gender, age group, and type of service received. (6.2) The average wait time for initial routine mental health counseling appointments. (6.3) The average number of campus mental health counseling appointments per student. (6.4) The number of students referred to off-campus providers for mental health services. (6.5) The number of student mental health staff by provider type and the counselor-to-student ratio. (6.6) Total spending on student mental health services, by fund source, including spending covered by insurance providers. (7) A description of how campuses leveraged or coordinated with other state or local resources to address housing and food insecurity and student mental health. (8) An analysis describing how funds reduced food insecurity and homelessness among students, increased student mental health, and, if feasible, how funds impacted student outcomes such as persistence or completion. (9) Other findings and best practices implemented by campuses. 2.2. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $25,000,000 is provided to support the transition of Humboldt State University into a polytechnic university. 2.3. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $35,000,000 is provided on an ongoing basis to support the Graduation Initiative 2025. This funding shall be used exclusively to support efforts to close equity gaps in graduation rates for low-income students and historically underrepresented students. California State University shall report on the activities it is undertaking to close equity gaps, how it is evaluating the result of these activities, the most important lessons it has learned to date, and what changes it needs to make moving forward to eliminate these gaps. The California State University also shall report systemwide and campus graduation rates for all students, low-income students, and historically underrepresented students, disaggregated by race. All of this information may be included in its annual report required by Section 89295 of the Education Code. 2.35. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $1,000,000 shall be available to support the Mervyn M. Dymally African American Political and Economic Institute at the California State University, Dominguez Hills. 2.4. (a) Of the funds appropriated in this item, $11,300,000 is provided to support ongoing implementation of the Project Rebound programs for formerly incarcerated students at participating California State University campuses. Funds shall be distributed to campuses using a funding formula that provides campuses with (1) standard baseline operating funds, (2) augmented baseline funding based on matriculated student enrollment headcounts in individual campus programs, and (3) annually recurring equity allocations for student basic needs relative to the indices of student need among program participants in individual campus programs, such as number of Pell Grant recipients, students who have exhausted their lifetime Pell Grant eligibility, students eligible for tuition exemptions pursuant to Chapter 814 of the Statutes of 2001 (Assembly Bill 540 of the 2001–02 Regular Session), and student parents of minor children. Model programming shall incorporate the following program components: (1) Admissions supports, including, but not limited to: (I) permitting eligible students to apply after the application initial filing period, (II) utilizing general exceptions as an educational opportunity program pursuant to Section 40900 of the California Code of Regulations and subdivision (c) of Section 66022.5 of the Education Code; and (III) facilitating the seamless transfer from one California State University to another of students enrolled in California State University degree programs while incarcerated who are released from custody prior to degree completion. (2) Comprehensive support to assist students with the transition to on-campus higher education, including (I) wraparound student support services that address needs such as books and supplies, tuition, scholarships, housing, food, and transportation; and (II) collaboration with offices of financial aid to provide individualized cost of attendance adjustments to minimize the impacts of program basic needs supports on student financial aid eligibility. (3) Staffing and space commitments, including: (I) dedicated staffing of a program coordinator or director, dedicated academic adviser or retention specialist, and student peer navigators with preference for staff with lived experience in the criminal justice system; (II) dedicated space on the university campus for the program that allows for both privacy and community; (III) use of the Federal Work-Study Program to provide eligible students with employment and professional development opportunities; and (IV) formal partnerships with California Community Colleges to build transfer pathways, and with other key stakeholders, including, but not limited to, the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, probation departments, and community-based organizations. (b) As a condition of receiving the $11,300,000 specified in this provision, the California State University shall, no later than April 1, 2026, and annually each year thereafter, report to the Department of Finance and the relevant policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature regarding the California State University’s use of these funds, program enrollment, and student outcomes. The report shall include, but not be limited to, the following: (1) A description of educational and support services each Project Rebound campus provides to students and potential students. (2) A description of outreach, orientation, and transfer support services the Project Rebound Consortium provides to students and potential students in the custody of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation. (3) Student enrollment in Project Rebound, disaggregated by race, ethnicity, gender, and age, as well as first-time freshmen, transfer students, undergraduate students, and graduate students, as well as students with prior foster care system involvement, prior juvenile justice involvement, and students that are parents of minor children. (4) Outcomes associated with the program, disaggregated by campus, including, but not limited to, student retention, graduation, and recidivism rates. (5) Any plans to expand Project Rebound to other California State University campuses. 2.45. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $1,000,000 shall be available to support students with disabilities. This funding shall supplement, not supplant, California State University core expenditures to support these students. The California State University shall allocate these funds to campuses based upon the number of students with disabilities. Campuses shall use these funds to improve services for these students, with a focus on increasing the number of professional staff serving them, thereby reducing their associated caseload. 2.5. (a) Of the funds appropriated in this item, $6,800,000 shall be available to support rapid rehousing efforts assisting homeless and housing-insecure students. (b) Campuses shall establish ongoing partnerships with community organizations that have a tradition of helping populations experiencing homelessness to provide wraparound services and rental subsidies for homeless and housing-insecure students. Funds appropriated in this item may be used for, but are not limited to, the following authorized activities: (1) Connecting students with community case managers who have knowledge and expertise in accessing safety net resources. (2) Establishing ongoing emergency housing procedures, including on-campus and off-campus resources. (3) Providing emergency grants that are necessary to secure housing or to prevent the imminent loss of housing. (c) Funding shall be allocated to campuses based on demonstrated need. (d) For the purposes of this item, “homeless” and “housing insecure” mean students who lack a fixed, regular, and adequate nighttime residence. This includes students who are: (1) Sharing the housing of other persons due to loss of housing, economic hardship, or a similar reason. (2) Living in motels, hotels, trailer parks, or camping grounds due to the lack of alternative adequate accommodations. (3) Living in emergency or transitional shelters. (4) Abandoned in hospitals. (5) Living in a primary nighttime residence that is a public or private place not designed for or ordinarily used as a regular sleeping accommodation for human beings. (6) Living in cars, parks, public spaces, abandoned buildings, substandard housing, bus or train stations, or similar settings. (e) The California State University shall annually submit a report to the Director of Finance and, in conformity with Section 9795 of the Government Code, to the Legislature regarding the use of these funds, including the number of coordinators hired, the number of students served by campus, the distribution of funds by campus, a description of the types of programs funded, and other relevant outcomes, such as the number of students who were able to secure permanent housing, and whether students receiving support remained enrolled at the institution or graduated. 2.6. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $6,000,000 shall be used by the California State University to provide summer-term financial aid to any student who is eligible for state financial aid and who is a California resident, including students who receive an exemption from nonresident tuition pursuant to Section 68130.5 of the Education Code. These funds shall be used to supplement and not supplant existing funds provided by the California State University for summer-term financial aid. The Legislature finds and declares that this provision is a state law within the meaning of subsection (d) of Section 1621 of Title 8 of the United States Code. 2.65. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $8,000,000 is provided on an ongoing basis to support the Asian American, Native Hawaiian, and Pacific Islander Student Achievement Program pursuant to Article 11 (commencing with Section 89297) of Chapter 2 of Part 55 of Division 8 of Title 3 of the Education Code. 3. (a) The Controller shall transfer funds from this appropriation as follows: (1) For base rental as and when provided for in the schedule submitted by the Department of Finance. Notwithstanding the payment dates in any related facility lease or indenture, the schedule may provide for an earlier transfer of funds to ensure debt requirements are met and to pay base rental in full when due. (2) For additional rental no later than 30 days after enactment of this budget, $49,000 of the amount appropriated in this item to the Expense Account in the Public Buildings Construction Fund. (3) This item may be adjusted pursuant to Section 4.30. Any adjustments to this item shall be reported to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee pursuant to Section 4.30. (4) For debt service anticipated to become due and payable in the fiscal year associated with state general obligation bonds issued for university projects upon receipt of any report from the Department of Finance. (b) The Controller shall return funds to this appropriation if directed pursuant to a report from the Department of Finance. 3.1. Notwithstanding any other law, the Director of Finance may reduce funds appropriated in this item by an amount equal to the estimated Cal Grant and Middle Class Scholarship program cost increases caused by a 2025–26 academic year increase in systemwide tuition. A reduction shall not be authorized pursuant to this provision sooner than 30 days after the Director of Finance provides notice of the intended reduction to the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee. 4. Payments made by the state to the California State University for each month from July through April shall not exceed one-twelfth of the amount appropriated in this item, less than the amount that is expected to be transferred pursuant to Provision 3. Transfers of funds pursuant to Provision 3 shall not be considered payments made by the state to the university. 5. (a) It is the intent of the Legislature that the California State University increase resident undergraduate enrollment by 7,152 full-time equivalent FTES in 2025–26 over the estimated 2024–25 level of 342,847 FTES for total resident undergraduate enrollment of 349,999 FTES in 2025–26 at the California State University. (b) If the California State University enrolls fewer resident undergraduate FTES in 2025–26 than specified in subprovision (a), the Director of Finance may reduce funding proportional to each student under the specified level. Funding shall be reduced at the 2025–26 state marginal cost rate of $10,983 per FTES. (c) It is the intent of the Legislature that the California State University also increase resident undergraduate enrollment in 2026–27. It is the expectation of the Legislature that the California State University increase resident undergraduate enrollment by an additional 10,161 FTES in 2026–27 for total resident undergraduate enrollment of 360,160 FTES. 6. (a) It is the intent of the Legislature to defer $143,839,000 one-time General Fund from the 2025–26 fiscal year to the 2026–27 fiscal year. (b) It is the intent of the Legislature to defer an ongoing base increase of $252,255,000 from the 2025–26 fiscal year as follows: (1) In the 2026–27 fiscal year , $100,902,000 of the 2025–26 compact payment will be provided on an ongoing basis. In 2028-29, the remaining $151,353,000 of the 2025–26 compact payment originally scheduled for the 2026–27 fiscal year will be provided on an ongoing basis. In the 2027–28 fiscal year, it is the intent of the Legislature to provide a one-time back payment of $252,255,000 from the deferral made in the 2025–26 fiscal year. 7. For the 2025–26 fiscal year, the Director of Finance may authorize a no-interest short-term loan from General Fund resources, upon request of the university, to assist cash flow resources for purposes of remediating state payment deferrals. A loan may be authorized pursuant to this section not sooner than 30 days after notification in writing of the necessity therefor is provided to the chairpersons of the committees in each house of the Legislature that consider appropriations and the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee or not sooner than whatever lesser time after that notification the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, or the Chairperson’s designee, may in each instance determine. 8. Each California State University campus that has experienced sustained enrollment declines shall submit a turnaround plan to the California State University Chancellor’s Office by December 31, 2025. Campuses shall consult with the community and campus stakeholders as they prepare the plan. Each turnaround plan shall include, but not be limited to, the following information: (1) A list of strategies the campus has decided to implement to increase student demand and enrollment; the expected outcomes of each strategy, including any results to date; an implementation timeline for each strategy, including actions taken to date; and the cost of each strategy (one time, ongoing, and total). Comparable information shall also be provided for any other strategies that the campus is seriously considering to increase its enrollment, even if the campus has not yet finalized or begun implementing them. (2) Enrollment projections for each of the next five years. (3) A list of cost-saving strategies the campus has decided to implement; the amount of associated savings (one time, ongoing, and total) expected to be achieved as a result of each strategy, including any savings achieved to date; and an implementation timeline for each strategy, including actions taken to date. Comparable information shall also be provided for any other strategies that the campus is seriously considering to reduce its costs, even if the campus has not yet finalized or begun implementing them. The Chancellor’s Office shall review and compile these plans into a consolidated report. The Chancellor’s Office shall include in the consolidated report strategies for reducing systemwide costs, particularly through management efficiencies and improved or innovative coordination. The consolidated report also shall include strategies for increasing student demand and enrollment systemwide. For these systemwide strategies, the Chancellor’s Office shall include comparable information as delineated in requirements (1) and (2). The Chancellor’s Office shall submit the consolidated report to the Department of Finance and relevant policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature by March 1, 2026. 9. Of the funds appropriated in this item, $806,000 shall be provided on a one-time basis to support Cal State Northridge Student Success and Inclusion Center infrastructure. SEC. 22. Item 6870-101-0001 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025 is amended to read: 6870-101-0001—For local assistance, Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges (Proposition 98) ........................ 5,848,337,000 Schedule: (1) 5670015-Apportionments ........................ 3,580,708,000 (2) 5670019-Apprenticeship ........................ 65,622,000 (3) 5670023-Apprenticeship Training and Instruction ........................ 62,485,000 (4) 5675040-Student Equity and Achievement Program ........................ 523,981,000 (5) 5675019-Student Financial Aid Administration ........................ 83,726,000 (6) 5675027-Disabled Students ........................ 178,686,000 (7) 5675031-Student Services for CalWORKs Recipients ........................ 56,922,000 (8) 5675035-Foster Care Education Program ........................ 6,154,000 (9) 5675045-Legal Services ........................ 10,000,000 (10) 5675061-Academic Senate for the Community Colleges ........................ 1,796,000 (11) 5675069-Equal Employment Opportunity ........................ 12,767,000 (12) 5675073-Part-Time Faculty Health Insurance ........................ 200,490,000 (13) 5675077-Part-Time Faculty Compensation ........................ 26,542,000 (14) 5675081-Part-Time Faculty Office Hours ........................ 23,626,000 (15) 5670035-Expand the Delivery of Courses through Technology ........................ 23,000,000 (16) 5675119-Economic Development ........................ 313,329,000 (17) 5675123-Transfer Education and Articulation ........................ 2,079,000 (18) 5675023-Extended Opportunity Programs and Services ........................ 223,912,000 (19) 5675115-Fund for Student Success ........................ 287,711,000 (20) 5675150-Campus Childcare Tax Bailout ........................ 4,420,000 (21) 5675156-Nursing Program Support ........................ 13,378,000 (22) 5675109-Institutional Effectiveness ........................ 27,500,000 (23) 5675098-Integrated Technology ........................ 101,503,000 (24) 5675042-Community College Summer Assistance Program ........................ 10,000,000 (25) 5675117-AANHPI Student Achievement Program ........................ 8,000,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item are for transfer by the Controller during the 2025–26 fiscal year to Section B of the State School Fund. 1.5 (a) The funds appropriated in Schedule (1) reflect a deferral of $408,363,000 to the 2026–27 fiscal year. (b) (1) To implement the monthly deferral schedule for community college districts pursuant to the higher education omnibus trailer bill identified in Section 39.00 as providing for appropriations related to this act, the Chancellor’s Office of the California Community Colleges may transfer to Schedule (1) of this item appropriations from schedules within this item that provide categorical program funding and that are being deferred. (2) If exercising the authority described in paragraph (1), the Chancellor’s Office of the California Community Colleges shall first defer appropriations from apportionments in Schedule (1) before transferring appropriations from schedules within this item that provide categorical program funding. (c) The transfers authorized by this provision shall be implemented through notification to appropriate staff of the Controller and the Department of Finance. 2. (a) The funds appropriated in Schedule (1) shall be allocated using the budget formula established pursuant to Section 84750.4 of the Education Code. The budget formula shall be adjusted to reflect the following: (1) Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $39,981,000 shall be used to increase statewide growth of full-time equivalent students (FTES) by 0.57 percent. It is the intent of the Legislature that the enrollment growth funding in this paragraph, when combined with the additional $100,000,000 provided for enrollment growth in the 2024–25 fiscal year in this act, support a combined growth percentage of 2.35 percent in the 2025–26 fiscal year. (2) Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $217,442,000 shall be used to reflect a cost-of-living adjustment of 2.30 percent. (3) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), the Chancellor’s Office of the California Community Colleges may allocate unused growth funding to backfill any unanticipated shortfalls in the total amount of funding appropriated and support the budget formula established pursuant to Section 84750.4 of the Education Code. (b) Funds allocated to a community college district from funds appropriated in Schedule (1) shall directly offset any mandated costs claimed for the Minimum Conditions for State Aid (02-TC-25 and 02-TC-31) program or any costs of complying with Section 84754.5 of the Education Code. (c) Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1): (1) Up to $100,000 is for a maintenance allowance, pursuant to Section 54200 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations. (2) Up to $500,000 is to reimburse colleges for the costs of federal aid repayments related to assessed fees for fee waiver recipients. This reimbursement only applies to students who completely withdraw from college before the census date pursuant to Section 58508 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations. (d) Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $91,207,000 shall be allocated to support the California College Promise pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 76396) of Chapter 2 of Part 47 of Division 7 of Title 3 of the Education Code. (e) (1) Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $50,000,000 shall be used to hire new full-time faculty for community college districts to increase their percentage of full-time faculty toward meeting the 75 percent full-time faculty target. The Chancellor’s Office of the California Community Colleges shall consult with representatives from the Department of Finance, the Legislature, and the Legislative Analyst’s Office before distributing these funds to community college districts. (2) Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $100,000,000 shall be used to hire new full-time faculty for participating community college districts to increase their percentage of full-time faculty toward meeting the 75 percent full-time faculty target. The Chancellor’s Office of the California Community Colleges shall consult with representatives from the Department of Finance, the Legislature, and the Legislative Analyst’s Office before distributing these funds to community college districts. It is the intent of the Legislature that the funding available pursuant to this paragraph be used to increase a district’s hiring of full-time faculty above the level that the district would have otherwise employed each year. (f) Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $8,065,000 is available on a one-time basis to backfill affected community college districts for property tax revenue losses as a result of fires leading to any states of emergency declared by the Governor in January, 2025. 3. (a) (1) The funds appropriated in Schedule (2) shall be available pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 79140) of Chapter 9 of Part 48 of Division 7 of Title 3 of the Education Code. Funds appropriated pursuant to this subdivision shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. (2) Pursuant to Section 79149.3 of the Education Code, the reimbursement rate shall be $10.32 per hour. (b) Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (2), $30,000,000 shall be used for the California Apprenticeship Initiative pursuant to Section 79148.1 of the Education Code. Funds appropriated pursuant to this subdivision shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2031. 4. (a) The funds appropriated in Schedule (3) shall be available pursuant to Article 8 (commencing with Section 8150) of Chapter 1 of Part 6 of Division 1 of Title 1 of the Education Code. Funds appropriated pursuant to this subdivision shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. (b) Pursuant to Section 8152 of the Education Code, the reimbursement rate shall be $10.32 per hour. 5. The funds appropriated in Schedule (4) shall be apportioned to community college districts pursuant to Section 78222 of the Education Code. 6. (a) Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (5): (1) Not less than $14,036,000 is available to provide $0.91 per unit reimbursement to community college districts for the provision of California College Promise Grants pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (m) of Section 76300 of the Education Code. (2) Not less than $14,190,000 is available for the Board Financial Assistance Program to provide reimbursement of 2 percent of total waiver value to community college districts for the provision of California College Promise Grants pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (m) of Section 76300 of the Education Code. (3) (A)  $5,300,000 shall be allocated to a community college district to conduct a statewide outreach, marketing, and paid media campaign to promote the following messages: (i) many types of financial aid are available year-round to cover fees and help with college costs, such as books, housing, and other educational costs; (ii) students can contact their local community college financial aid office to get one-on-one assistance with completing and submitting financial aid applications and forms; and (iii) a community college education can improve the lives of students and their families by providing financial aid, as well as career training and guaranteed transfer opportunities to get into a rewarding, good-paying career. The campaign should target efforts to reach ethnically diverse, low-income students in primarily underresourced communities who must overcome barriers in accessing postsecondary education. The Chancellor’s Office of the California Community Colleges shall apprise the Student Aid Commission of ongoing outreach and marketing efforts. (B) Of the amount identified in subparagraph (A), $2,500,000 shall be allocated to: (i) expand outreach for students from non-English speaking households and bilingual households; (ii) tie financial aid messaging to enrollment messaging where applicable to encourage current and potential students to enroll or continue their education at a California Community College and apply for financial aid; and (iii) marketing and outreach aimed at increasing current and potential student awareness of the California College Promise Grant and other types of financial aid available for California Community College students. Bilingual efforts shall target areas of the state that meet at least one of the following conditions: (i) have concentrations of non-English speaking and bilingual households, or (ii) have underserved populations, a history of declining community college attendance, or both. (4) Not more than $45,200,000 shall be for direct contact with potential and current financial aid applicants. Each California Community College campus shall receive a minimum allocation of $50,000. The remainder of the funding shall be allocated to campuses based upon a formula reflecting full-time equivalent students (FTES) weighted by a measure of low-income populations demonstrated by the California College Promise Grant program participation within a district. (5) Funds allocated to a community college district pursuant to paragraphs (1) and (2) shall supplement, not supplant, the level of funds allocated for the administration of student financial aid programs during the 2001–02 or 2006–07 fiscal year, whichever is greater. (6) Funding allocated to a community college district pursuant to paragraphs (1) and (2) shall directly offset any costs claimed by that district for any of the following mandates: Enrollment Fee Collection (99-TC-13), Enrollment Fee Waivers (00-TC-15), Cal Grants (02-TC-28), and Tuition Fee Waivers (02-TC-21). (7) Notwithstanding subdivision (m) of Section 76300 of the Education Code or any other law, the amount of funds appropriated for the purpose of administering fee waivers for the 2025–26 fiscal year shall be determined in this act. (8) Not more than $5,000,000 shall be for ongoing maintenance, subscription, and training costs for financial aid technology advancements and innovations that streamline the financial aid verification process and enable colleges to more efficiently process state and federal financial aid grants. It is the intent of the Legislature that system improvements supported by this funding have the effect of reducing the manual processing of financial aid applications, thereby enabling financial aid program staff to provide additional technical assistance and guidance to students seeking financial aid. The Chancellor’s Office of the California Community Colleges shall determine the methodology for allocating these funds to community college districts. 7. (a) The funds appropriated in Schedule (6) shall be used to assist districts in funding the excess direct instructional cost of providing special support services or instruction, or both, to disabled students enrolled at community colleges and for state hospital programs, as mandated by federal law. (b) Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (6): (1) At least $3,945,000 shall be used to address deficiencies identified by the United States Department of Education Office for Civil Rights. (2) At least $943,000 shall be used to support the High Tech Centers for activities, including, but not limited to, training of district employees, staff, and students in the use of specialized computer equipment for the disabled. (3) At least $9,600,000 shall be allocated to community college districts for sign language interpreter services, real-time captioning equipment, or other communication accommodations for hearing-impaired students. A community college district is required to spend $1 from local or other resources for every $4 received pursuant to this paragraph. 8. (a) The funds appropriated in Schedule (7) shall be allocated pursuant to Article 5 (commencing with Section 79200) of Chapter 9 of Part 48 of Division 7 of Title 3 of the Education Code. (b) Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (7): (1) $11,504,000 shall be for childcare, except that a community college district may request that the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges approve the use of funds for other purposes. (2) No less than $6,135,000 shall be used to provide direct workstudy wage reimbursement for students served under this program, and $769,000 is available for campus job development and placement services. 9. The funds appropriated in Schedule (8) shall be allocated to community college districts to provide foster and relative or kinship care education and training pursuant to Article 8 (commencing with Section 79420) of Chapter 9 of Part 48 of Division 7 of Title 3 of the Education Code. A community college district shall ensure that education and training required pursuant to paragraphs (12) and (13) of subdivision (g) of Section 16519.5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code receive priority. 10. The funds appropriated in Schedule (9) shall be allocated to a community college district to contract with the State Department of Social Services in order to contract with organizations qualified pursuant to Chapter 5.6 (commencing with Section 13300) of Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code to provide services pursuant to that chapter to persons on California Community College campuses. Use of these funds shall be included in updates provided to the Legislature on the State Department of Social Services’ immigration programs. 11. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (10), $685,000 is available to support the Academic Senate for California Community Colleges course identification numbering system efforts and shall be subject to the requirements of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (5) of subdivision (b) of Section 70901 of the Education Code. 12. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (11), $10,000,000 shall be allocated to community college districts to support the continued implementation of equal employment opportunity plans and to enable campuses to engage in sustainable practices to diversify faculty, staff, and administrators, including the continued use of best practices and tools identified by office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges’ Equal Employment Opportunity and Diversity Advisory Committee. 13. The funds appropriated in Schedule (12) shall be allocated to community college districts for the purpose of providing a state incentive program to encourage community college districts to offer health insurance for part-time faculty pursuant to Article 9 (commencing with Section 87860) of Chapter 3 of Part 51 of Division 7 of Title 3 of the Education Code. 14. The funds in Schedule (13) shall be allocated to increase compensation for part-time faculty. Funds shall be allocated to districts based on the total actual number of full-time equivalent students (FTES) in the previous fiscal year, with an adjustment to the allocations provided to small districts. These funds shall be used to assist districts in making part-time faculty salaries more comparable to full-time salaries for similar work, as determined through collective bargaining in each community college district. If a community college district achieves parity between compensation for full-time faculty and part-time faculty, funds received pursuant to this provision may be used for any other educational purpose. 15. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (15): (a) $20,000,000 shall be allocated to the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges to increase the number of courses available through the use of technology, provide alternative methods for students to earn college credit, and support the California Virtual Campus Distance Education Program. These funds may be used to pay for a consistent learning management system to help implement this program. The chancellor shall ensure, to the extent possible, that the following conditions are satisfied: (1) These courses can be articulated across all community college districts. (2) These courses are made available to students systemwide, regardless of the campus at which a student is enrolled. (3) Students who complete these courses are granted degree-applicable credit across community colleges. (4) These funds shall be used for those courses that have the highest demand, fill quickly, and are prerequisites for many different degrees. (b) By September 1 of each fiscal year, up to $3,000,000 shall be disbursed by the Office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges to one or more community college districts to provide textbooks or digital course content to students incarcerated or detained in federal or state prison, county jail, juvenile facility, or other correctional institutions who are enrolled in one or more California Community College courses. The provision of this material is expected to enable community college districts to provide instruction to incarcerated or detained students. (1) To the extent possible, community college districts providing textbooks or digital course content pursuant to this subdivision are encouraged to first use open educational resources. (2) Notwithstanding any other law, a contract between the Office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges and a community college district for purposes of this subdivision is not subject to any competitive bidding requirements of Section 10340 of the Public Contract Code. 16. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (16): (a) $22,929,000 is available for the following purposes: (1) Up to 10 percent may be allocated for state-level technical assistance, including statewide network leadership, organizational development, coordination, and information and support services. (2) All remaining funds shall be allocated for programs that target investments in priority and emergent sectors, including statewide or regional centers, hubs, collaborative communities, advisory bodies, and short-term grants. Short-term grants may include industry-driven regional education and training, Responsive Incumbent Worker Training, and Job Development Incentive Training. Funds allocated pursuant to this provision may be used to provide substantially similar services in support of the Strong Workforce Program. (3) Funds applied to performance-based training shall be matched by a minimum of $1 contributed by private businesses or industry for each $1 of state funds. The Chancellor of the California Community Colleges shall consider the level of involvement and financial commitments of business and industry in making awards for performance-based training. (b) $290,400,000 shall be available to support the Strong Workforce Program pursuant to Part 54.5 (commencing with Section 88820) of Division 7 of Title 3 of the Education Code. Of this amount, $60,000,000 shall be available to support the Rebuilding Nursing Infrastructure Grant Program pursuant to Sections 88770, 88771, 88772, and 88773 of the Education Code. It is the intent of the Legislature to appropriate $60,000,000 each fiscal year between 2025–26 to 2028–29, inclusive, to support the Rebuilding Nursing Infrastructure Grant Program. 17. Of the funds provided in Schedule (17): (a) $1,381,000 shall be used to support the Historically Black Colleges and Universities (HBCU) Transfer Pathway program, which helps develop transfer guarantee agreements that help facilitate a smooth transition for students from the California Community Colleges to partnered HBCU institutions. (b) (1) $698,000 shall be used to support transfer and articulation projects and common course numbering projects. (2) Funding provided to community college districts shall directly offset any costs claimed by community college districts to be mandates pursuant to Chapter 737 of the Statutes of 2004. 18. (a) Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (18): (1) $189,298,000 shall be used pursuant to Article 8 (commencing with Section 69640) of Chapter 2 of Part 42 of Division 5 of Title 3 of the Education Code. Funds provided in this item for Community College Extended Opportunity Programs and Services shall be available to students on all campuses within the California Community Colleges system. (2) $34,614,000 shall be used for funding, at all colleges, the Cooperative Agencies Resources for Education program in accordance with Article 4 (commencing with Section 79150) of Chapter 9 of Part 48 of Division 7 of Title 3 of the Education Code. The Chancellor of the California Community Colleges shall allocate these funds to local programs on the basis of need for student services. (b) Of the amount allocated pursuant to subdivision (a), no less than $4,972,000 shall be available to support additional textbook assistance grants to community college students. 19. The funds appropriated in Schedule (19) shall be used for the following purposes: (a) $13,326,000 shall be used for the Puente Project to support up to 115 colleges. These funds are available if matched by $200,000 of private funds and if the participating community colleges and University of California campuses maintain their 1995–96 fiscal year support level for the Puente Project. (1) Of the funds provided in subdivision (a), $5,331,000 shall be allocated to a community college district to contract with the Puente Project to support the general operation of, and direct services delivered through, central administration which includes, but is not limited to, professional development, program data collection, program research and evaluation, and initiatives to improve student transfer rates. (2) Of the funds provided in subdivision (a), $7,995,000 shall be allocated directly to participating districts in accordance with their participation agreement. (3) (A) If the appropriation provided in this subdivision is increased from the funding level provided in the 2022–23 fiscal year, funding allocated to districts as described in paragraphs (1) and (2) shall be adjusted consistent with their percentage share of total funding in this subdivision. (B) Notwithstanding paragraphs (1) and (2), if the appropriation provided in this subdivision is reduced from the funding level provided in the 2022–23 fiscal year, the Puente Project, in consultation with the Chancellor’s Office of the California Community Colleges, will determine the funding allocation to support services and programs provided in paragraphs (1) and (2). (4) In any fiscal year in which districts have any unexpended or unencumbered funds allocated pursuant to paragraph (2) by June 30, the Puente Project will determine a reallocation of funds that may include, but not be limited to, maintaining the allocation level for a participating site or reallocating funds to another participating site. (b) (1) $39,423,000 is to allow all colleges to establish and support California Community College Mathematics, Engineering, Science Achievement (MESA) programs. Funds provided in this item for MESA programs shall be available to students on all campuses within the California Community Colleges system to enhance California’s STEM workforce, while aiding the state and nation in reducing equity and achievement gaps. (2) The Office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges shall award each MESA program ongoing annual funding to meet the program’s goals, at a minimum allocation of $280,000 per college. Colleges receiving an allocation shall use the funding to supplement, but not supplant, local sources of funding supporting MESA programs. (3) In any fiscal year in which districts have any unexpended or unencumbered funds allocated pursuant to subprovision (2) by June 30 of that year, MESA shall make a determination regarding the reallocation of funds that shall include maintaining the allocation level for a participating MESA program or reallocating funds to another participating MESA program. (c) No less than $1,836,000 is for the Middle College High School Program. With the exception of special part-time students at the community colleges pursuant to Sections 48802 and 76001 of the Education Code, student workload based on participation in the Middle College High School Program shall not be eligible for community college state apportionment. (d) (1) (A) No less than $9,178,000 is for the Umoja program. (B) Of funds provided in subparagraph (A), $3,671,000 shall be allocated to a community college district to contract with the Umoja Statewide program office to provide additional resources to facilitate the capacity building and development of the statewide office in an effort to expand the Umoja program, build a data support system, target the needs of special populations in the African American community, improve tutoring and mental health resources, enhance STEM/STEAM and career opportunities, and improve outcomes for students enrolled in Umoja campus programs. (C) Of the funds provided in subparagraph (A), $5,507,000 shall be allocated by the Office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges directly to participating districts in accordance with their Umoja Statewide participation agreement for campuses with Umoja programming. Umoja Statewide, in consultation with the Chancellor’s Office, shall determine the allocation of resources to campuses. The Umoja Statewide program shall annually report, by July 30, updates on the status of Umoja’s capacity building and expansion plan to the Office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges and the budget committees of the Senate and Assembly. Of the funds provided in this subparagraph, 1 percent shall be allocated directly to the community college district contracting with the Umoja Statewide program office for purposes related to this subparagraph. (e) Consistent with the intent of Article 7 (commencing with Section 79220) of Chapter 9 of Part 48 of Division 7 of Title 3 of the Education Code, the chancellor shall enter into agreements with community college districts to provide additional services in support of postsecondary education for foster youth. Up to $54,110,000 of the funds appropriated in this item shall be prioritized for services pursuant to Article 7 (commencing with Section 79220) of Chapter 9 of Part 48 of Division 7 of Title 3 of the Education Code. Further, the chancellor shall ensure that the list of eligible expenditures developed pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 78221 of the Education Code includes expenditures that are consistent with the intent of Article 7 (commencing with Section 79220) of Chapter 9 of Part 48 of Division 7 of Title 3 of the Education Code. (f) $10,822,000 of the funds shall be for support of Veteran Resource Centers. To the extent funding is provided in the annual Budget Act, the chancellor shall only allocate funding to community colleges that commit to either meeting or making progress towards meeting the minimum standards developed by the Office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges. (g) (1) Colleges shall establish ongoing partnerships with community organizations that have a tradition of helping populations experiencing homelessness to provide wraparound services and rental subsidies for homeless and housing-insecure students. $20,562,000 of the funds appropriated in Schedule (19) may be used for, but are not limited to, the following authorized activities: (A) Connecting students with community case managers who have knowledge and expertise in accessing safety net resources. (B) Establishing ongoing emergency housing procedures, including on-campus and off-campus resources. (C) Providing emergency grants that are necessary to secure housing or to prevent the imminent loss of housing. (2) Funding shall be allocated to campuses based on demonstrated need. (3) “Homeless” and “housing-insecure” mean students who lack a fixed, regular, and adequate nighttime residence. This includes students who are: (A) Sharing the housing of other persons due to loss of housing, economic hardship, or a similar reason. (B) Living in motels, hotels, trailer parks, or camping grounds due to the lack of alternative adequate accommodations. (C) Living in emergency or transitional shelters. (D) Abandoned in hospitals. (E) Living in a primary nighttime residence that is a public or private place not designed for or ordinarily used as a regular sleeping accommodation for human beings. (F) Living in cars, parks, public spaces, abandoned buildings, substandard housing, bus or train stations, or similar settings. (4) By July 15 of each year, the Office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges shall submit a report to the Director of Finance and, in conformity with Section 9795 of the Government Code, to the Legislature regarding the prior year use of these funds, including the number of coordinators hired, the number of students served by campus, the distribution of funds by campus, a description of the types of programs funded, and other relevant outcomes, such as the number of students who were able to secure permanent housing, and whether students receiving support remained enrolled at the institution or graduated. (h) $11,600,000 shall be allocated by the Chancellor’s Office of the California Community Colleges to community colleges to support Dreamer Resource Liaisons and student support services, including those related to career pathways and economic mobility, for immigrant students, pursuant to Section 66021.8 of the Education Code. (i) $75,754,000 shall be available to support the basic needs of community college students. (1) (A) Of the amount allocated for this subdivision, $32,466,000 shall be available to provide for student mental health resources. (B) The Chancellor’s Office of the California Community Colleges shall submit a report to the Department of Finance and relevant policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature by January 1, 2025, and every three years thereafter, regarding the use of funds specified in this paragraph. The report shall include, but not necessarily be limited to, all of the following information: (i) The amount of funds provided for each community college district. (ii) A description of how the funds were used for the purposes reflected in this paragraph. (iii) A description of the types of programs in which districts invested. (iv) The number of students receiving mental health services on campus disaggregated by race/ethnicity, gender, age group, and type of service received. (v) The average wait time for initial routine mental health counseling appointments. (vi) The average number of campus mental health counseling appointments per student. (vii) The number of students referred to off-campus providers for mental health services. (viii) Total spending on student mental health services, by fund source, including spending covered by insurance providers. (ix) Other findings and best practices implemented by districts. (2) Of the amount made available by this subdivision, $43,288,000 shall be allocated by the Chancellor’s Office of the California Community Colleges for colleges to establish and operate basic needs centers as a centralized location on campus where students experiencing basic needs insecurity can be identified, supported, and linked to on- and off-campus resources to support timely program completion pursuant to Section 66023.5 of the Education Code. Colleges shall also designate or hire dedicated basic needs coordinators for the basic needs centers who will serve as a single point of contact for students. (j) (1) $35,000,000 shall be available to support the Rising Scholars Network pursuant to Article 6 (commencing with Section 78070) of Chapter 1 of Part 48 of Division 7 of Title 3 of the Education Code. (2) (A) Of the funds provided for in paragraph (1), 60 percent annually shall support ongoing implementation of model programming for juvenile justice-impacted students, as a grant program administered and supported by the Rising Scholars Network of the Chancellor’s Office of the California Community Colleges. Funds shall be used for model college programming with key components based on the Project Change model, to be offered both within juvenile facilities and on the community college campus, to establish a direct pathway to college for juvenile justice-impacted young people. (B) Of the funds provided for in subparagraph (A), at least 86.7 percent annually shall support a maximum of 45 community colleges on 5-year grant cycles to implement model programming to serve juvenile justice-impacted students, incorporating the three following core Project Change program components: (i) College programming that is: (I) offering University of California and California State University transferable courses and comprehensive student support programming; (II) provided by a California Community College through instruction; and (III) offered both on campus at a community college and in local juvenile detention facilities. (ii) Comprehensive support to assist students with the transition to on-campus higher education, including: (I) wraparound student support services that address basic needs such as books and supplies, tuition, fees, stipends, housing, food, and transportation; and (II) educational transition plans for students, outlining their multiyear framework from high school through college completion. (iii) Staffing and space commitments, including: (I) dedicated staffing of a program lead, counselor, and retention specialist; (II) dedicated space on the college campus for the program; and (III) formal partnerships with key stakeholders, including, but not limited to, the local county office of education, probation department, local high school districts, and community-based organizations. (C) Community colleges may implement model program components on a phased timeline. Model programs must utilize both Dual Enrollment and Guided Pathways frameworks. At the conclusion of the 5-year cohort, community colleges may reapply for continued funding support. (D) Colleges may be funded on a tiered model. Tiered model funding may consider the number of core program components a college can implement; student counts; whether the college already has an established or funded Rising Scholars program; and other metrics determined by the Rising Scholars Network of the Office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges. (E) Of the funds provided in subparagraph (A), 8.3 percent annually shall support technical assistance for successful implementation of model programming overseen by the Rising Scholars Network of the Office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges. Technical assistance includes contract staffing positions to oversee the project implementation, in-person trainings, and support. (k) (1) $1,100,000 shall be allocated by the Chancellor’s Office for the expansion of African American Male Education Network and Development (A2MEND) student charters at up to 50 colleges to improve academic success and develop a student support structure for African American male students attending community colleges. (2) In considering an allocation methodology to community colleges, the Office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges shall consider a factor that allocates funds to community colleges that have submitted work plans pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (c) of Section 88922 of the Education Code, including considering the community college’s guided pathways activities and practices. (l) (1) (A) $10,000,000 shall be allocated on a one-time basis by the Chancellor’s Office to participating community college districts to provide additional funds to support LGBTQ+ students. For the purposes of allocating and expending this funding, the Chancellor’s Office and participating community college districts shall follow the requirements as stipulated in Section 89 of Chapter 144 of the Statutes of 2021. (B) Notwithstanding paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 89 of Chapter 144 of the Statutes of 2021, the Chancellor’s Office shall provide grants of up to $900,000 for participating community college districts based on the proportional share of students they serve and equity metrics to ensure that small rural colleges are also able to access the grants. Participating community college districts may encumber the funds over a five-year period. (m) $5,000,000 shall be available on an ongoing basis to support the Credit for Prior Learning Initiative pursuant to Section 26 of the 2025 Higher Education Omnibus Trailer Bill (Ch. 9, Stats. 2025). 20. The funds appropriated in Schedule (20) shall be allocated by the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges to community college districts that levied childcare permissive override taxes in the 1977–78 fiscal year pursuant to Sections 8272 and 8272.5 of the Education Code in an amount proportional to the property tax revenues, tax relief subventions, and state aid required to be made available by the district to its childcare and development program for the 1979–80 fiscal year pursuant to Section 30 of Chapter 1035 of the Statutes of 1979, increased or decreased by any cost-of-living adjustment granted in subsequent fiscal years. These funds shall be used only for the purpose of community college childcare and development programs. 21. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (21): (a) $8,475,000 shall be used to provide support for nursing programs. (b) $4,903,000 shall be used for diagnostic and support services, preentry coursework, alternative program delivery model development, and other services to reduce the incidence of student attrition in nursing programs. 22. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (22): (a) (1) $7,500,000 may be used by the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges to provide technical assistance to community college districts that demonstrate low performance in any area of operations. It is the intent of the Legislature that technical assistance providers be contracted in a cost-effective manner, that they primarily consist of experts who are current and former employees of the California Community Colleges, and that they provide technical assistance consistent with the vision for the California Community Colleges. (2) Technical assistance funded pursuant to this paragraph that is initiated by the chancellor may be provided at no cost to the community college district. If a community college district requests technical assistance, the district is required to spend at least $1 from local or other resources for every $2 received, as determined by the chancellor. (b) (1) $20,000,000 may be used by the chancellor to provide regional and online workshops and trainings to community college personnel to promote statewide priorities, including, but not limited to, strategies to improve student achievement; strategies to improve community college operations; and system leadership training to better coordinate planning and implementation of statewide initiatives in alignment with the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges’ Vision for Success. To the extent possible, the chancellor shall partner with existing statewide initiatives with proven results of improving student success and institutional effectiveness. Each fiscal year, the chancellor shall submit a report on the use of funds appropriated pursuant to this provision in the prior year to the Department of Finance and the Joint Legislative Budget Committee no later than December 31 of each year and, beginning in the 2025–26 fiscal year and every three years thereafter, the chancellor shall submit a report on the use of the funds appropriated pursuant to this provision in the prior three years to the Department of Finance and the Joint Legislative Budget Committee no later than December 31 of that year. This report shall include information regarding California Community Colleges’ participation in the activities funded pursuant to this provision. (2) Funding available pursuant to this paragraph may be used by the chancellor to coordinate with community college districts to conduct policy research, and develop and disseminate effective practices through the establishment of an online clearinghouse of information. The development of effective practices shall include, but not be limited to, statewide priorities such as the development of educational programs or courses for the incarcerated adults in prisons and jails, and the formerly incarcerated, educational programs or courses for California Conservation Corps members, and other effective practices. The online clearinghouse of information shall also reflect effective practices, guidance, policies, curriculum, courses, and programs developed by local community colleges in support of the Strong Workforce Program established pursuant to Part 54.5 (commencing with Section 88820) of Division 7 of Title 3 of the Education Code. (3) It is the intent of the Legislature to encourage the chancellor to facilitate the development of local community college courses for the California Conservation Corps and the incarcerated adults in prisons and jails, and the formerly incarcerated. The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation and the California Conservation Corps are encouraged to partner with the Chancellor’s Office in the development and dissemination of local community college courses and effective practices pursuant to this paragraph and paragraph (2). 23. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (23): (a) $10,613,000 shall be allocated to continue providing a systemwide and integrated online infrastructure that supports the continuity of education and quality distance learning across the community college system. These infrastructure investments may include, but are not limited to, access to online tutoring and counseling, ensuring available and accessible technical support, and providing mental health services and other student support services. (b) $8,000,000 shall be provided to cover increased administrative costs related to the Corporation for Education Network Initiatives in California. (c) $41,890,000 shall be allocated by the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges for the following purposes: (1) Procurement, development, evaluation, and upgrading of high-priority systemwide technology tools and infrastructure, including, but not limited to, e-transcript, e-planning, and other tools to assist colleges to implement multiple measures of assessment pursuant to Chapter 745 of the Statutes of 2017, and technologies that facilitate portability of education credentials. (2) Provision of access to statewide multimedia hosting and delivery services for colleges and districts. (3) Provision of systemwide internet, audio bridging, data security, and telephony. (4) Services related to technology use, including accessibility guidance and information security. (5) Technology product development and program management, technical assistance and planning, and cooperative purchase agreements. (6) Ongoing faculty and staff development related to technology use and adoption. (7) Ongoing support of the California Partnership for Achieving Student Success (Cal-PASS) program. (8) Ongoing support for programs designed to use technology in assisting accreditation and the alignment of curricula across K–20 segments in California, as well as to support integration and interoperability toward an improved student experience. (9) Support for technology pilots and ongoing technology programs and applications that serve to maximize the utility and economy of scale of the technology investments of the community college system toward improving learning outcomes. (10) Up to 5 percent of the funds may be allocated by the chancellor to a community college district for statewide activities, not limited to statewide technical assistance to evaluate, plan, and continuously improve the system’s data and technology roadmap and deployment. (d) Any funds not allocated pursuant to subdivision (c) shall be available for allocations to districts to maintain technology capabilities. (e) $4,000,000 shall be used to expand the implementation of the systemwide technology platform for library services to better manage and deliver digital information to support teaching and learning, including for students enrolled in distance education. (f) (1) $25,000,000 shall be provided for community college districts to implement local and systemwide technology and data security measures that support improved oversight of fraud mitigation, online learning quality, and cybersecurity efforts. Funds shall be used by community college districts to hire local cybersecurity staff, and funds shall also be used for systemwide measures, including, but not limited to, security upgrades for CCCApply and education technology platforms and the establishment of systemwide cybersecurity teams. (2) As a condition of receiving funds pursuant to this subdivision, a community college district shall do all of the following: (A) Complete an annual cybersecurity self-assessment of their information technology infrastructure to determine their National Institute of Standards and Technology (NIST) Computer Systems Laboratory (CSL) score and report their current phase in Cal-Secure standards. (B) Participate in the following regularly scheduled cybersecurity reporting: (i) Submit remediation updates twice per year, for the fall and spring semester terms, on vulnerability and other issues identified in the previous self-assessment or triennial assessment. (ii) Submit detailed after-action reports of all cybersecurity incidents that either lead to a breach of personally identifiable information or lead to the disruption of services, including, but not limited to, a breach of student identification numbers, distributed denial-of-service attacks, and ransomware. (iii) The total number of admission applications received from CCCApply that are determined to be fraudulent, including applications marked as “likely fraud” within CCCApply, on an annual basis. (iv) Information requested on suspected fraudulent enrollments, and fraudulent receipt of financial aid, on an annual basis. (C) Reporting required by this section shall not be duplicated by other reporting required by the Office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges. (3) If the reporting required pursuant to paragraph (2) is duplicative of other reports provided by a community college district, a community college district may submit those reports in lieu of the reporting required by paragraph (2). (g) (1) Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (23), $12,000,000 shall be provided on a one-time basis for the Common Cloud Data Platform. This platform shall enhance statewide reporting, data sharing, and available analytical tools across community college districts and the Chancellor’s Office. The platform shall be designed to support community college student success initiatives, improve community college districts’ stewardship of resources and ability to use data-driven decision making, streamline community college administrative processes, and inform state budget and policy making. (2) The Chancellor’s Office shall submit a report to the Department of Technology, the Department of Finance, and the relevant policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature on or before January 15, 2026, detailing the progress to date of the Common Cloud Data Platform, which includes the Common Cloud Data Platform Demonstration Project. The report shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following information: (A) The platform’s implementation status and milestones achieved. (B) The platform’s intended impacts on student outcomes and systemwide efficiencies. (C) The platform’s state-level benefits. (D) A table detailing how the funds for the Common Cloud Data Platform Demonstration Project and how the funds appropriated in paragraph (1) have been spent or will be spent. (E) Any challenges encountered and solutions implemented during the development of the platform. (F) A plan, as of the report date, for the further development and expansion of the platform beyond the funds appropriated for this project as of July 1, 2025, if the Chancellor’s Office determines there is sufficient value in expansion and plans to seek more funding. The plan shall specify the project’s scope, anticipated schedule, and estimated total cost upon full implementation. (3) The Department of Technology and the Department of Finance shall review the report submitted pursuant to paragraph (2). As part of its assessment, the departments shall verify that the plan pursuant to subparagraph (F) of paragraph (2) for further development and expansion of the platform is well planned and a reasonable use of resources. The Chancellor’s Office shall provide the departments with additional information, as needed, for the departments to complete their review of the project. The departments shall provide a report to the relevant policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature by March 31, 2026, containing recommendations related to the further development and expansion of the platform. 24. The funds appropriated in Schedule (24) shall be allocated to support the Classified Community College Employee Summer Assistance Program established pursuant to Article 11 (commencing with Section 88280) of Chapter 4 of Part 51 of Division 7 of Title 3 of the Education Code. 25. The funds appropriated in Schedule (25) shall be allocated on an ongoing basis by the Office of the Chancellor to support the California Community Colleges Asian American, Native Hawaiian, and Pacific Islander Student Achievement Program pursuant to Article 10 (commencing with Section 79510) of Chapter 9 of Part 48 of Division 7 of Title 3 of the Education Code. 26. Beginning on October 1, 2022, and annually thereafter, the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges shall provide the Legislature and Department of Finance a list of all statewide or regional projects, initiatives, and services administered by districts in partnership with the Office of the Chancellor. The list shall include the amount of each agreement from the prior fiscal year, the categorical program funding source, the name of the fiscal agent, the contractor, and a brief description of the services provided by and the deliverables expected of the contractor to the Office of the Chancellor or other districts. The list shall be comprehensive, including all grants and contracts. SEC. 23. Item 6870-194-0001 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025 is amended to read: 6870-194-0001—For local assistance, Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges, to allow selected community colleges to make payments on lease-revenue bonds ........................ 2,469,000 Schedule: (1) 5675132—Student Housing ........................ 2,469,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in this item are for transfer by the Controller to Section B of the State School Fund. The Controller shall transfer funds appropriated in this item for base rental as and when provided for in the schedule submitted by the State Public Works Board. Notwithstanding the payment dates in any related facility lease or indenture, the schedule may provide for an earlier transfer of funds to ensure debt requirements are met and pay base rental in full when due. 2. The Controller shall transfer for additional rental no later than 30 days after enactment of this budget, $0 of the amount appropriated in this item, to the Expense Account in the Public Buildings Construction Fund. 3. This item may be adjusted pursuant to Section 4.30. Any adjustments to this item shall be reported to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee pursuant to Section 4.30. SEC. 24. Item 6870-403 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025, to read: 6870-403—Pursuant to Section 17581.5 of the Government Code, mandates included in this item are specifically identified by the Legislature for suspension during the 2025–26 fiscal year: (1) Law Enforcement Jurisdiction Agreements (Ch. 284, Stats. 1998) (98-TC-20) (2) Integrated Waste Management (Ch. 1116, Stats. 1992) (00-TC-07) (3) Sexual Assault Response Procedures (Ch. 423, Stats. 1990) (99-TC-12) (4) Student Records (Ch. 593, Stats. 1989) (02-TC-34) (5) Health Benefits for Survivors of Peace Officers and Firefighters (Ch. 1120, Stats. 1996) (97-TC-25) (6) Law Enforcement Sexual Harassment Training (Ch. 126, Stats. 1993) (97-TC-07) (7) Grand Jury Proceedings (Ch. 1170, Stats. 1996) (98-TC-27) (8) County Treasury Withdrawals (Ch. 784, Stats. 1995) (96-365-03) (9) Absentee Ballots (Ch. 77, Stats. 1978) (CSM 3713) (10) Brendon Maguire Act (Ch. 391, Stats. 1988) (CSM 4357) (11) Mandate Reimbursement Process I and II (Ch. 486, Stats. 1975 and Ch. 890, Stats. 2004) (CSM 4204, CSM 4485, and 05-TC-05) (12) Sex Offenders: Disclosure by Law Enforcement Officers (Chs. 908 and 909, Stats. 1996) (97-TC-15) SEC. 25. Item 7760-101-0001 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2025 is amended to read: 7760-101-0001—For local assistance, Department of General Services ........................ 3,000,000 Schedule: (1) 6320019-Public School Construction ........................ 3,000,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in this item shall be used to fund the STEM Teacher Recruitment Grant at EnCorps, Inc. Notwithstanding any other law, funds provided in this provision may be transferred to Item 6350-601-0001 for distribution by the Office of Public School Construction, Department of General Services. This amount shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure through the 2027–28 fiscal year. SEC. 26. Section 8.50 of the Budget Act of 2025 is amended to read: SEC. 8.50. (a) In making appropriations to state agencies that are eligible for federal programs, it is the intent and understanding of the Legislature that applications made by the agencies for federal funds under federal programs shall be for the maximum amount allowable under federal law. Therefore, any amounts received from the federal government are hereby appropriated from federal funds for expenditure or for transfer to, and disbursement from, the State Treasury fund established for the purpose of receiving the federal assistance subject to any provisions of this act that apply to the expenditure of these funds, including Section 28.00. (b) However, if federal funds for block grant programs assumed by the state or for any item receiving federal funds are reduced by more than 5 percent of the amount appropriated in this act, the Director of Finance shall notify the chairpersons of the committees in each house of the Legislature that consider appropriations, and the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, in writing within 30 days after notification by the federal government that federal funds have been reduced, and shall include an estimate of the amount of the available or anticipated federal funds, the 2025–26 fiscal year expenditures of each program affected by the reduction, the effect of reduced funding on service levels authorized by this act, and a plan of reduced expenditures for each program affected by the reduction. The plan shall be operational on an interim basis for up to 45 days pending legislative review, after which time the plan shall become permanent. (c) Any expenditure of federal Temporary Assistance for Needy Families (TANF) block grant funds in excess of the amounts specified and appropriated in this act are subject to the notification procedures and requirements set forth in Section 28.00, or Provision 4 of Item 5180-101-0001 of Section 2.00, whichever is applicable. The notification and other requirements of Section 28.00 also shall apply to any proposed substitution of TANF block grant funds for other state or federal funds. SEC. 27. Section 13.30 of the Budget Act of 2025 is amended to read: SEC. 13.30. (a) The Director of Finance may make available from the General Fund loans to eligible local entities that, in the aggregate, total no more than $1,000,000,000 for eligible local entities in Los Angeles County and no more than $750,000,000 for eligible local entities that are not in Los Angeles County. (b) For purposes of this section, “eligible local entities” includes all of the following: (1) Local government entities, including, but not limited to, the County of Los Angeles, the Los Angeles County Office of Education, and cities, special districts, school districts, and community college districts located in Los Angeles County, if the entity has significant responsibilities for recovery from the January 2025 wildfires in that county. (2) San Francisco Bay Area Rapid Transit District. (3) San Francisco Municipal Transportation Agency. (4) Peninsula Corridor Joint Powers Board. (5) Alameda-Contra Costa Transit District. (c) Loans authorized in subdivision (a) shall be provided to eligible local entities in Los Angeles County for public purposes related to recovery from the January 2025 wildfires in the county. (d) Loans authorized in subdivision (a) shall be provided to eligible local entities that are not in Los Angeles County for operating expenditures to maintain transit services. (e) This section shall be operative only if trailer bill legislation establishing the terms of the loans is enacted in the 2025 legislative session, including both of the following: (1) In furtherance of this requirement, the trailer bill legislation shall, at a minimum, require full repayment of the loan principal with any agreed-upon interest rate, pursuant to a clearly defined repayment schedule. (2) The trailer bill legislation shall require a guaranteed repayment mechanism to ensure that any funding provided under this section is repaid from a reliable and predictable revenue source. For funding pursuant to subdivision (d), repayment may include, but is not limited to, future fare revenue. (f) Notwithstanding subdivision (e), subdivision (d) shall be operative only if future legislation is enacted during the 2025 regular legislative session, which, at a minimum, shall authorize a regional measure to support the long-term financial stability of transit operators specified in subdivision (b). This measure is intended to reinforce the ability of these agencies to repay the state funds provided pursuant to this section. SEC. 28. Section 37.00 of the Budget Act of 2025 is repealed. SEC. 29. Section 39.00 of the Budget Act of 2025 is amended to read: SEC. 39.00. The Legislature hereby finds and declares that the following bills are other bills providing for appropriations related to the Budget Bill within the meaning of subdivision (e) of Section 12 of Article IV of the California Constitution: AB 116, AB 117, AB 118, AB 119, AB 120, AB 121, AB 122, AB 123, AB 124, AB 125, AB 126, AB 127, AB 128, AB 129, AB 130, AB 131, AB 132, AB 133, AB 134, AB 135, AB 136, AB 137, AB 138, AB 139, AB 140, AB 141, AB 143, SB 116, SB 117, SB 118, SB 119, SB 120, SB 121, SB 122, SB 123, SB 124, SB 125, SB 126, SB 127, SB 128, SB 129, SB 130, SB 131, SB 132, SB 133, SB 134, SB 135, SB 136, SB 137, SB 138, SB 139, SB 140, SB 141, and SB 143. SEC. 30. Section 39.10 is added to the Budget Act of 2025 (Senate Bill 101 of 2025), to read: SEC. 39.10. In addition to this act, the Budget Act of 2025 consists of the following statutes: (a) Chapter 4 of the Statutes of 2025 (Senate Bill No. 101). (b) Chapter 5 of the Statutes of 2025 (Assembly Bill No. 102). SEC. 31. Section 99.50 of the Budget Act of 2025 is amended to read: INDEX FOR CONTROL SECTIONS SEC. 99.50. The following is an index to the general sections of this act. These sections serve to define terms and identify restrictions concerning the appropriations contained in this act. 1.00 Budget Act Citation 1.50 Intent and Format 1.51 Citations to Prior Budget Acts 1.80 Availability of Appropriations 2.00 Items of Appropriation 3.00 Defines Purposes of Appropriations 3.10 Subschedule Transfers for Capital Projects 3.50 Benefit Charges Against Salaries and Wages 3.60 Contribution to Public Employees’ Retirement Benefits 3.61 Contribution to Prefund Other Postemployment Benefits 3.90 Reduction for Employee Compensation 4.05 Budget Adjustment Authority 4.11 Position Vacancy Report 4.12 Vacant Position Elimination 4.13 AB 85 Repayments to Counties 4.20 Contribution to Public Employees’ Contingency Reserve  Fund 4.30 Lease-Revenue Payment Adjustments 4.72 Electric Vehicle Charging Infrastructure 4.75 Statewide Surcharge 4.80 State Public Works Board Interim Financing 4.90 Architectural Revolving Fund Transfer 4.95 Inmate and Ward Construction Revolving Account Transfer 5.25 Attorney’s Fees 6.00 Project Alterations Limits 8.00 Antiterrorism Federal Reimbursements 8.50 Federal Funds Receipts 8.51 Federal Funds Accounts 8.52 Federal Reimbursements 8.53 Notice of Federal Audits 8.54 Enforce Recovery of Federal Funds for Statewide Indirect  Costs 8.75 Infrastructure Investment and Jobs Act 9.30 Federal Levy of State Funds 9.50 Minor Capital Outlay Projects 11.00 Information Technology Reporting Requirements 11.10 Reporting of Statewide Software License Agreements 11.11 Privacy of Information in Pay Stubs 11.25 Artificial Intelligence Projects in State Departments 11.96 Coronavirus Fiscal Relief 11.97 State Appropriation Limit Excludable Federal Fund  Appropriations for Capital Outlay 12.00 State Appropriations Limit (SAL) 12.30 Special Fund for Economic Uncertainties 12.32 Proposition 98-Funding Guarantee 12.35 Financial Aid Policy Change Requirements 12.45 June to July Payroll Deferral 13.00 Legislative Counsel Bureau 13.30 Emergency Loans for Local Entities 13.40 Budgetary Loan Borrowing from Special Funds 14.00 Special Fund Loans Between Boards of the Department of  Consumer Affairs 15.14 Allocation of Greenhouse Gas Reduction Fund 15.25 Data Center Rate Adjustment 15.45 Trial Court Funding Offsets 19.56 Appropriations for Legislative Priorities 19.57 Encumbrance Deadline Extension Authority 20.00 Reappropriations and Reversions 24.00 State School Fund Allocations 24.03 Reading Control 24.30 Transfer School Building Rental Income to the General  Fund 24.60 Report of Lottery Funds Received 24.70 Local Educational Agency Fiscal Accountability 25.40 Contracted Fiscal Services Costs 25.50 SCO Apportionment Payment System Assessments 26.00 Intraschedule Transfers 28.00 Program Change Notification 28.30 Federal Funds Realignment 28.31 Short-Term Cash Loans Due to Delay in Federal Funds 28.50 Agency Reimbursement Payments 29.00 Position Estimates of Governor’s Budget, May Revision,  and Final Change Book 30.00 Continuous Appropriations 31.00 Budget Act Administrative Procedures for Salaries and Wages 32.00 Prohibits Excess Expenditures 33.00 Item Veto Severability 34.00 Constitutional Severability 35.21 Application of Net Final Payment Accrual Methodology 35.35 FI$Cal—​Short-Term Cash Loans 35.50 Estimated General Fund Revenues and Various Estimates  Related to the Budget Stabilization Account 38.00 Provides That This Bill Is a Budget Bill 39.00 Identification of Bills Related to the Budget Bill 90.00 Los Angeles County Response and Recovery Costs 99.00 Alphabetical Organization Index 99.50 Numerical Control Section Index SEC. 32. This act is a Budget Bill within the meaning of subdivision (e) of Section 12 of Article IV of the California Constitution and shall take effect immediately.